Missouri, session 2025S2, HB2.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 128.345, 128.346, and 128.348, RSMo, are repealed and twelve
2 new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 128.345, 128.346, 128.348,
3 128.471, 128.472, 128.473, 128.474, 128.475, 128.476, 128.477, 128.478, and 128.479, to
4 read as follows:
128.345. 1. All referencesin sections128.451 to 128.458 to counties,voting districts
2 (VTD),andtract-blocks(Block)meanthosecounties,votingdistricts(VTD),andtract-blocks
3 (Block)asreportedtothestatebytheUnitedStatesBureauoftheCensusforthe2010census.
4 2. Allreferencesinsections128.461to[128.468]128.478tocounties,votingdistricts
5 (VTD),andtract-blocks(Block)meanthosecounties,votingdistricts(VTD),andtract-blocks
6 (Block)asreportedtothestatebytheUnitedStatesBureauoftheCensusforthe2020census.
128.346. 1. Thedistrictsestablishedbytheprovisionsofsections128.400to128.440
2 for the election of representatives to the Congress of the United States shall be effective
3 beginningwithelectiontothe108thCongressandthroughtheelectionofthe112thCongress.
4 2. The districts established by sections 128.451 to 128.458 for the election of
5 representatives to the Congress of the United States shall be effective beginning with the
6 election to the 113th Congress and through the election of the 117th Congress.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2 2
7 3. The districts established by sections 128.461 to 128.468 for the election of
8 representatives to the Congress of the United States shall be effective beginning with the
9 election to the 118th Congress and through the election of the 119th Congress.
10 4. The districts established by sections 128.471 to 128.478 for the election of
11 representatives to the Congress of the United States shall be effective beginning with the
12 election of the 120th Congress.
128.348. 1. Effective with the election for the 113th Congress and through the
2 election of the 117th Congress, the state of Missouri shall consist of eight congressional
3 districts.
4 2. Effectivewiththeelectionofthe118thCongress,thestateofMissourishallconsist
5 of eight congressional districts.
6 3. Effective with the election of the 120th Congress, the state of Missouri shall
7 consist of eight congressional districts.
8 4. The legal voters of each district shall elect one member of Congress of the United
9 States.
128.471. The first congressional district shall be composed of the following:
2 County: St. Louis City MO
3 County: St. Louis MO
4 VTD: AP001
5 VTD: AP002
6 VTD: AP003
7 VTD: AP004
8 VTD: AP005
9 VTD: AP006
10 VTD: AP007
11 VTD: AP008
12 VTD: AP009
13 VTD: AP010
14 VTD: AP011
15 VTD: AP012
16 VTD: AP013
17 VTD: AP014
18 VTD: AP015
19 VTD: AP016
20 VTD: AP017
21 VTD: AP018
22 VTD: AP019

HB 2 3
23 VTD: AP020
24 VTD: AP021
25 VTD: AP022
26 VTD: AP023
27 VTD: AP024
28 VTD: AP025
29 VTD: AP026
30 VTD: AP027
31 VTD: AP028
32 VTD: AP029
33 VTD: AP030
34 VTD: AP031
35 VTD: AP032
36 VTD: AP033
37 VTD: AP034
38 VTD: AP035
39 VTD: AP036
40 VTD: AP037
41 VTD: AP038
42 VTD: AP039
43 VTD: AP040
44 VTD: AP041
45 VTD: AP042
46 VTD: AP043
47 VTD: AP044
48 VTD: AP045
49 VTD: AP046
50 VTD: AP047
51 VTD: AP048
52 VTD: AP049
53 VTD: AP050
54 VTD: AP051
55 VTD: AP200
56 VTD: AP201
57 VTD: AP202
58 VTD: AP203
59 VTD: AP206

HB 2 4
60 VTD: AP207
61 VTD: AP208
62 VTD: AP211
63 VTD: AP214
64 VTD: AP215
65 VTD: AP216
66 VTD: AP217
67 VTD: AP218
68 VTD: AP225
69 VTD: AP230
70 VTD: AP232
71 VTD: AP233
72 VTD: AP237
73 VTD: CC001
74 VTD: CC002
75 VTD: CC003
76 VTD: CC004
77 VTD: CC005
78 VTD: CC006
79 VTD: CC007
80 VTD: CC008
81 VTD: CC009
82 VTD: CC011
83 VTD: CC012
84 Block: 291892155001004
85 VTD: CC013
86 Block: 291892155002015
87 VTD: CC017
88 VTD: CC018
89 VTD: CC022
90 Block: 291892155001002
91 Block: 291892155001003
92 Block: 291892155001005
93 Block: 291892155001010
94 Block: 291892155001011
95 Block: 291892155001012
96 Block: 291892155002014

HB 2 5
97 VTD: CC030
98 VTD: CC031
99 VTD: CC035
100 VTD: CC037
101 VTD: CC038
102 VTD: CC041
103 VTD: CC042
104 VTD: CC043
105 VTD: CC044
106 VTD: CC045
107 VTD: CC047
108 VTD: CC050
109 VTD: CC053
110 VTD: CC054
111 VTD: CC056
112 VTD: CC057
113 VTD: CC058
114 VTD: CC201
115 VTD: CC202
116 VTD: CC203
117 VTD: CC205
118 VTD: CC208
119 VTD: CC214
120 VTD: CC221
121 VTD: CLA001
122 VTD: CLA002
123 VTD: CLA003
124 VTD: CLA004
125 Block: 291892165004005
126 Block: 291892165004006
127 Block: 291892165004007
128 Block: 291892165004008
129 Block: 291892165004009
130 Block: 291892165004010
131 Block: 291892165004011
132 Block: 291892165004012
133 Block: 291892165004013

HB 2 6
134 Block: 291892165004014
135 Block: 291892165004015
136 Block: 291892165004016
137 Block: 291892165004017
138 Block: 291892165004018
139 Block: 291892165004019
140 Block: 291892165004020
141 Block: 291892165004022
142 Block: 291892165004023
143 Block: 291892165004024
144 Block: 291892165004025
145 Block: 291892165004026
146 VTD: CLA005
147 VTD: CLA008
148 VTD: CLA009
149 VTD: CLA011
150 VTD: CLA013
151 Block: 291892165004021
152 VTD: CLA017
153 VTD: CLA019
154 VTD: CLA020
155 VTD: CLA027
156 VTD: CLA029
157 VTD: CLA043
158 VTD: CLA044
159 VTD: CLA052
160 VTD: FER001
161 VTD: FER002
162 VTD: FER003
163 VTD: FER004
164 VTD: FER005
165 VTD: FER006
166 VTD: FER007
167 VTD: FER008
168 VTD: FER009
169 VTD: FER010
170 VTD: FER011

HB 2 7
171 VTD: FER012
172 VTD: FER013
173 VTD: FER014
174 VTD: FER015
175 VTD: FER016
176 VTD: FER017
177 VTD: FER018
178 VTD: FER019
179 VTD: FER020
180 VTD: FER021
181 VTD: FER022
182 VTD: FER023
183 VTD: FER024
184 VTD: FER025
185 VTD: FER026
186 VTD: FER027
187 VTD: FER028
188 VTD: FER029
189 VTD: FER030
190 VTD: FER031
191 VTD: FER032
192 VTD: FER033
193 VTD: FER034
194 VTD: FER035
195 VTD: FER036
196 VTD: FER037
197 VTD: FER038
198 VTD: FER039
199 VTD: FER040
200 VTD: FER041
201 VTD: FER042
202 VTD: FER043
203 VTD: FER044
204 VTD: FER045
205 VTD: FER046
206 VTD: FER206
207 VTD: FER207

HB 2 8
208 VTD: FER208
209 VTD: FLO001
210 VTD: FLO002
211 VTD: FLO003
212 VTD: FLO004
213 VTD: FLO005
214 VTD: FLO006
215 VTD: FLO007
216 VTD: FLO008
217 VTD: FLO009
218 VTD: FLO010
219 VTD: FLO011
220 VTD: FLO012
221 VTD: FLO013
222 VTD: FLO014
223 VTD: FLO015
224 VTD: FLO016
225 VTD: FLO017
226 VTD: FLO018
227 VTD: FLO019
228 VTD: FLO020
229 VTD: FLO021
230 VTD: FLO022
231 VTD: FLO023
232 VTD: FLO024
233 VTD: FLO025
234 VTD: FLO026
235 VTD: FLO027
236 VTD: FLO028
237 VTD: FLO029
238 VTD: FLO030
239 VTD: FLO031
240 VTD: FLO200
241 VTD: FLO201
242 VTD: FLO205
243 VTD: FLO207
244 VTD: HAD001

HB 2 9
245 VTD: HAD002
246 VTD: HAD003
247 VTD: HAD004
248 VTD: HAD005
249 VTD: HAD008
250 VTD: HAD009
251 VTD: HAD010
252 VTD: HAD011
253 VTD: HAD012
254 VTD: HAD013
255 VTD: HAD014
256 VTD: HAD015
257 VTD: HAD016
258 VTD: HAD017
259 VTD: HAD018
260 VTD: HAD019
261 VTD: HAD020
262 VTD: HAD021
263 VTD: HAD022
264 VTD: HAD023
265 VTD: HAD025
266 VTD: HAD026
267 VTD: HAD027
268 VTD: HAD028
269 VTD: HAD029
270 VTD: HAD030
271 Block: 291892170002010
272 Block: 291892170002014
273 Block: 291892170004000
274 Block: 291892170004001
275 Block: 291892170004002
276 Block: 291892170004003
277 Block: 291892170004004
278 Block: 291892170004005
279 Block: 291892170004006
280 Block: 291892170004007
281 Block: 291892170004008

HB 2 10
282 Block: 291892170004009
283 Block: 291892170004010
284 Block: 291892170004011
285 Block: 291892170004012
286 Block: 291892170004013
287 Block: 291892170004014
288 Block: 291892170004015
289 Block: 291892170004016
290 Block: 291892170004017
291 Block: 291892170004018
292 Block: 291892172001000
293 Block: 291892172001001
294 Block: 291892172001002
295 Block: 291892172001003
296 Block: 291892172001004
297 Block: 291892172001005
298 Block: 291892172001006
299 Block: 291892172001007
300 Block: 291892172001008
301 Block: 291892172001009
302 Block: 291892172002005
303 Block: 291892172002006
304 Block: 291892172002012
305 Block: 291892172002013
306 Block: 291892172002015
307 Block: 291892172002016
308 Block: 291892172002017
309 Block: 291892172002018
310 Block: 291892172002019
311 Block: 291892172002020
312 Block: 291892172002021
313 Block: 291892172002022
314 Block: 291892172002023
315 Block: 291892172002024
316 Block: 291892172002025
317 Block: 291892172002026
318 Block: 291892173002035

HB 2 11
319 VTD: HAD032
320 VTD: HAD033
321 VTD: HAD034
322 VTD: HAD035
323 VTD: LC001
324 VTD: LC002
325 VTD: LC003
326 VTD: LC004
327 VTD: LC005
328 VTD: LC006
329 VTD: LC007
330 VTD: LC008
331 VTD: LC009
332 VTD: LC010
333 VTD: LC011
334 VTD: LC012
335 VTD: LC013
336 VTD: LC014
337 VTD: LC015
338 VTD: LC016
339 VTD: LC017
340 VTD: LC018
341 VTD: LC019
342 VTD: LC020
343 VTD: LC021
344 VTD: LC022
345 VTD: LC023
346 VTD: LC024
347 VTD: LC025
348 VTD: LC026
349 VTD: LC027
350 VTD: LC028
351 VTD: LC029
352 VTD: LC030
353 VTD: LC031
354 VTD: LC032
355 VTD: LC033

HB 2 12
356 VTD: LC200
357 VTD: LC203
358 VTD: LC204
359 VTD: LC209
360 VTD: LEM007
361 Block: 291892202001000
362 Block: 291892202001002
363 VTD: MHT006
364 VTD: MHT008
365 VTD: MHT010
366 VTD: MHT011
367 VTD: MHT012
368 VTD: MHT013
369 VTD: MHT014
370 VTD: MHT015
371 VTD: MHT017
372 VTD: MHT018
373 VTD: MHT020
374 VTD: MHT021
375 VTD: MHT022
376 VTD: MHT023
377 VTD: MHT025
378 VTD: MHT028
379 VTD: MHT029
380 VTD: MHT031
381 VTD: MHT032
382 VTD: MHT033
383 VTD: MHT034
384 VTD: MHT036
385 VTD: MHT037
386 VTD: MHT038
387 VTD: MHT040
388 VTD: MHT041
389 VTD: MHT042
390 VTD: MHT043
391 VTD: MHT044
392 VTD: MHT045

HB 2 13
393 VTD: MHT046
394 VTD: MHT047
395 VTD: MHT048
396 VTD: MHT049
397 VTD: MHT052
398 VTD: MHT057
399 VTD: MHT058
400 VTD: MHT059
401 VTD: MHT200
402 VTD: MHT203
403 VTD: MHT206
404 VTD: MHT211
405 VTD: MHT216
406 VTD: MHT220
407 VTD: MHT222
408 VTD: MID001
409 VTD: MID002
410 VTD: MID003
411 VTD: MID004
412 VTD: MID005
413 VTD: MID006
414 VTD: MID007
415 VTD: MID008
416 VTD: MID009
417 VTD: MID010
418 VTD: MID011
419 VTD: MID012
420 VTD: MID013
421 VTD: MID014
422 VTD: MID015
423 VTD: MID016
424 VTD: MID017
425 VTD: MID018
426 VTD: MID019
427 VTD: MID020
428 VTD: MID021
429 VTD: MID022

HB 2 14
430 VTD: MID023
431 VTD: MID024
432 VTD: MID025
433 VTD: MID026
434 VTD: MID027
435 VTD: MID028
436 VTD: MID030
437 VTD: MID031
438 VTD: MID032
439 VTD: MID033
440 VTD: MID034
441 VTD: MID035
442 VTD: MID036
443 VTD: MID037
444 VTD: MID038
445 VTD: MID039
446 Block: 291892155002016
447 Block: 291892155004018
448 VTD: MID040
449 VTD: MID041
450 VTD: MID042
451 VTD: MID043
452 VTD: MID044
453 VTD: MID045
454 VTD: MID046
455 VTD: MID047
456 VTD: MID048
457 VTD: MID049
458 VTD: MID050
459 VTD: MID051
460 VTD: MID052
461 VTD: MID053
462 VTD: MID054
463 VTD: MID055
464 VTD: MID056
465 VTD: MID057
466 VTD: MID058

HB 2 15
467 VTD: MID059
468 VTD: MID060
469 VTD: MID061
470 VTD: MID200
471 VTD: MID201
472 VTD: MID202
473 VTD: MID204
474 VTD: NOR001
475 VTD: NOR002
476 VTD: NOR003
477 VTD: NOR004
478 VTD: NOR005
479 VTD: NOR006
480 VTD: NOR007
481 VTD: NOR008
482 VTD: NOR009
483 VTD: NOR010
484 VTD: NOR011
485 VTD: NOR012
486 VTD: NOR013
487 VTD: NOR014
488 VTD: NOR015
489 VTD: NOR016
490 VTD: NOR017
491 VTD: NOR018
492 VTD: NOR019
493 VTD: NOR020
494 VTD: NOR021
495 VTD: NOR022
496 VTD: NOR023
497 VTD: NOR024
498 VTD: NOR025
499 VTD: NOR026
500 VTD: NOR027
501 VTD: NOR028
502 VTD: NOR029
503 VTD: NOR030

HB 2 16
504 VTD: NOR031
505 VTD: NOR032
506 VTD: NOR033
507 VTD: NOR034
508 VTD: NOR035
509 VTD: NOR036
510 VTD: NOR037
511 VTD: NOR038
512 VTD: NOR039
513 VTD: NOR040
514 VTD: NOR041
515 VTD: NOR042
516 VTD: NOR043
517 VTD: NOR044
518 VTD: NOR045
519 VTD: NOR046
520 VTD: NOR047
521 VTD: NOR048
522 VTD: NOR049
523 VTD: NOR050
524 VTD: NOR051
525 VTD: NOR052
526 VTD: NOR053
527 VTD: NOR054
528 VTD: NOR055
529 VTD: NOR056
530 VTD: NOR200
531 VTD: NOR201
532 VTD: NOR202
533 VTD: NOR203
534 VTD: NOR204
535 VTD: NOR208
536 VTD: NOR213
537 VTD: NOR218
538 VTD: NOR222
539 VTD: NRW001
540 VTD: NRW002

HB 2 17
541 VTD: NRW003
542 VTD: NRW004
543 VTD: NRW005
544 VTD: NRW006
545 VTD: NRW007
546 VTD: NRW008
547 VTD: NRW009
548 VTD: NRW010
549 VTD: NRW011
550 VTD: NRW012
551 VTD: NRW013
552 VTD: NRW014
553 VTD: NRW015
554 VTD: NRW016
555 VTD: NRW017
556 VTD: NRW018
557 VTD: NRW019
558 VTD: NRW020
559 VTD: NRW021
560 VTD: NRW022
561 VTD: NRW023
562 VTD: NRW024
563 VTD: NRW025
564 VTD: NRW026
565 VTD: NRW027
566 VTD: NRW028
567 VTD: NRW029
568 VTD: NRW030
569 VTD: NRW031
570 VTD: NRW032
571 VTD: NRW033
572 VTD: NRW034
573 VTD: NRW035
574 VTD: NRW036
575 VTD: NRW037
576 VTD: NRW038
577 VTD: NRW039

HB 2 18
578 VTD: NRW040
579 VTD: NRW041
580 VTD: NRW042
581 VTD: NRW043
582 VTD: NRW044
583 VTD: NRW045
584 VTD: NRW046
585 VTD: NRW047
586 VTD: NRW048
587 VTD: NRW049
588 VTD: NRW050
589 VTD: NRW051
590 VTD: NRW200
591 VTD: NRW201
592 VTD: NRW202
593 VTD: NRW203
594 VTD: NRW204
595 VTD: NRW205
596 VTD: NW001
597 VTD: NW002
598 VTD: NW003
599 VTD: NW004
600 VTD: NW005
601 VTD: NW006
602 VTD: NW007
603 VTD: NW008
604 VTD: NW009
605 VTD: NW010
606 VTD: NW011
607 VTD: NW012
608 VTD: NW013
609 VTD: NW014
610 VTD: NW015
611 VTD: NW016
612 VTD: NW017
613 VTD: NW018
614 VTD: NW019

HB 2 19
615 VTD: NW020
616 VTD: NW021
617 VTD: NW022
618 VTD: NW023
619 VTD: NW024
620 VTD: NW025
621 VTD: NW026
622 VTD: NW027
623 VTD: NW028
624 VTD: NW029
625 VTD: NW030
626 VTD: NW031
627 VTD: NW032
628 VTD: NW033
629 VTD: NW034
630 VTD: NW035
631 VTD: NW036
632 VTD: NW037
633 VTD: NW038
634 VTD: NW039
635 VTD: NW040
636 VTD: NW041
637 VTD: NW042
638 VTD: NW043
639 VTD: NW044
640 VTD: NW045
641 VTD: NW046
642 VTD: NW047
643 VTD: NW048
644 VTD: NW049
645 VTD: NW050
646 VTD: NW051
647 VTD: NW052
648 VTD: NW200
649 VTD: NW201
650 VTD: NW202
651 VTD: NW203

HB 2 20
652 VTD: NW204
653 VTD: NW205
654 VTD: NW206
655 VTD: NW207
656 VTD: NW208
657 VTD: NW209
658 VTD: NW210
659 VTD: NW211
660 VTD: NW212
661 VTD: NW213
662 VTD: NW214
663 VTD: NW215
664 VTD: NW216
665 VTD: NW217
666 VTD: NW219
667 VTD: NW220
668 VTD: NW224
669 VTD: NW225
670 VTD: NW226
671 VTD: NW227
672 VTD: NW229
673 VTD: SF001
674 VTD: SF002
675 VTD: SF003
676 VTD: SF004
677 VTD: SF005
678 VTD: SF006
679 VTD: SF007
680 VTD: SF008
681 VTD: SF009
682 VTD: SF010
683 VTD: SF011
684 VTD: SF012
685 VTD: SF013
686 VTD: SF014
687 VTD: SF015
688 VTD: SF016

HB 2 21
689 VTD: SF017
690 VTD: SF018
691 VTD: SF019
692 VTD: SF020
693 VTD: SF021
694 VTD: SF022
695 VTD: SF023
696 VTD: SF024
697 VTD: SF025
698 VTD: SF026
699 VTD: SF027
700 VTD: SF028
701 VTD: SF029
702 VTD: SF030
703 VTD: SF031
704 VTD: SF032
705 VTD: SF033
706 VTD: SF034
707 VTD: SF035
708 VTD: SF200
709 VTD: SPL001
710 VTD: SPL002
711 VTD: SPL003
712 VTD: SPL004
713 VTD: SPL005
714 VTD: SPL006
715 VTD: SPL007
716 VTD: SPL008
717 VTD: SPL009
718 VTD: SPL010
719 VTD: SPL011
720 VTD: SPL012
721 VTD: SPL013
722 VTD: SPL014
723 VTD: SPL015
724 VTD: SPL016
725 VTD: SPL017

HB 2 22
726 VTD: SPL018
727 VTD: SPL019
728 VTD: SPL020
729 VTD: SPL021
730 VTD: SPL022
731 VTD: SPL023
732 VTD: SPL024
733 VTD: SPL025
734 VTD: SPL026
735 VTD: SPL027
736 VTD: SPL028
737 VTD: SPL201
738 VTD: SPL202
739 VTD: SPL207
740 VTD: SPL208
741 VTD: UNV001
742 VTD: UNV002
743 VTD: UNV003
744 VTD: UNV004
745 VTD: UNV005
746 VTD: UNV006
747 VTD: UNV007
748 VTD: UNV008
749 VTD: UNV009
750 VTD: UNV010
751 VTD: UNV011
752 VTD: UNV012
753 VTD: UNV013
754 VTD: UNV014
755 VTD: UNV015
756 VTD: UNV016
757 VTD: UNV017
758 VTD: UNV018
759 VTD: UNV019
760 VTD: UNV020
761 VTD: UNV021
762 VTD: UNV022

HB 2 23
763 VTD: UNV023
764 VTD: UNV024
765 VTD: UNV025
766 VTD: UNV026
767 VTD: UNV027
768 VTD: UNV028
769 VTD: UNV029
770 VTD: UNV030
771 VTD: UNV031
772 VTD: UNV032
773 VTD: UNV033
774 VTD: UNV034
775 VTD: UNV035
776 VTD: UNV036
777 VTD: UNV037
778 VTD: UNV038
779 VTD: UNV039
780 VTD: UNV040
781 VTD: UNV041
782 VTD: UNV042
783 VTD: UNV043
784 VTD: UNV045
785 VTD: UNV201
786 VTD: UNV202
787 VTD: UNV205
788 VTD: UNV206
789 VTD: UNV208
128.472. The second congressional district shall be composed of the following:
2 County: St. Charles MO
3 VTD: Adams
4 VTD: All Saints
5 VTD: Arlington
6 VTD: Aspen
7 VTD: Bayfield
8 Block: 291833117321002
9 Block: 291833117321005
10 Block: 291833117321006

HB 2 24
11 Block: 291833117321007
12 Block: 291833117323003
13 Block: 291833117323008
14 Block: 291833117323009
15 Block: 291833117323012
16 Block: 291833117324014
17 Block: 291833117324015
18 Block: 291833117324018
19 Block: 291833117324019
20 Block: 291833117324020
21 VTD: Briarhill
22 VTD: Canary
23 VTD: Canvas Cove
24 VTD: Carriage Hills
25 VTD: Cave Springs
26 VTD: Cheshire
27 VTD: Claybrook
28 VTD: Coachman
29 VTD: Cottleville
30 VTD: Country Hill
31 VTD: Coverdell
32 Block: 291833102022031
33 Block: 291833103011000
34 Block: 291833103011001
35 Block: 291833103011002
36 Block: 291833103011003
37 Block: 291833103011004
38 Block: 291833103011005
39 Block: 291833103011006
40 Block: 291833103011007
41 Block: 291833103011008
42 Block: 291833103012010
43 Block: 291833103012017
44 Block: 291833103022001
45 Block: 291833103022002
46 Block: 291833103022003
47 Block: 291833103022028

HB 2 25
48 Block: 291833103022029
49 Block: 291833103022033
50 VTD: Covilli
51 VTD: Discovery
52 VTD: Edgewood
53 Block: 291833102022029
54 Block: 291833102022030
55 Block: 291833103011013
56 Block: 291833103011014
57 Block: 291833103011015
58 Block: 291833103011016
59 Block: 291833103011017
60 Block: 291833103011021
61 Block: 291833103012000
62 Block: 291833103012001
63 Block: 291833103012002
64 Block: 291833103012003
65 Block: 291833103012004
66 Block: 291833103012005
67 Block: 291833103012006
68 Block: 291833103012007
69 Block: 291833103012008
70 Block: 291833103012009
71 Block: 291833103012011
72 Block: 291833103012012
73 Block: 291833103012013
74 Block: 291833103012014
75 Block: 291833103012015
76 Block: 291833103012016
77 Block: 291833103012018
78 Block: 291833103012019
79 Block: 291833103012020
80 Block: 291833103012021
81 Block: 291833103012022
82 Block: 291833103012023
83 Block: 291833103012024
84 Block: 291833103012025

HB 2 26
85 Block: 291833103012026
86 Block: 291833106022000
87 Block: 291833115002046
88 Block: 291833115002047
89 Block: 291833115002050
90 Block: 291833115002074
91 Block: 291833115002075
92 Block: 291833115002076
93 Block: 291833115002077
94 Block: 291833115002078
95 Block: 291833115002079
96 Block: 291833115002081
97 VTD: Fairmount
98 VTD: Fairways
99 VTD: Fox
100 VTD: Glengate
101 Block: 291833117381024
102 Block: 291833117382003
103 Block: 291833117382008
104 Block: 291833117382010
105 Block: 291833117382013
106 VTD: Government
107 VTD: Graybridge
108 VTD: Green Forest
109 VTD: Hanover
110 VTD: Harmony
111 Block: 291833116021045
112 VTD: Harvester
113 VTD: Heritage
114 VTD: Hi Point
115 VTD: Hillcrest
116 VTD: Kampville
117 Block: 291833115001055
118 Block: 291833115001056
119 Block: 291833115001057
120 Block: 291833115001062
121 Block: 291833115001063

HB 2 27
122 Block: 291833115001102
123 Block: 291833115002048
124 Block: 291833115002049
125 Block: 291833115002051
126 Block: 291833115002052
127 Block: 291833115002054
128 Block: 291833115002055
129 Block: 291833115002056
130 Block: 291833115002057
131 Block: 291833115002058
132 Block: 291833115002059
133 Block: 291833115002060
134 Block: 291833115002061
135 Block: 291833115002062
136 Block: 291833115002063
137 Block: 291833115002064
138 Block: 291833115002069
139 Block: 291833115002070
140 Block: 291833115002071
141 VTD: Katy Trail
142 VTD: Lakes
143 VTD: Laura Hill
144 Block: 291833114223024
145 Block: 291833116021038
146 Block: 291833117341000
147 Block: 291833117341001
148 Block: 291833117341002
149 Block: 291833117341003
150 Block: 291833117341004
151 Block: 291833117341005
152 Block: 291833117341006
153 Block: 291833117341007
154 Block: 291833117341008
155 Block: 291833117341009
156 Block: 291833117341010
157 Block: 291833117341011
158 Block: 291833117341012

HB 2 28
159 Block: 291833117341013
160 Block: 291833117341014
161 Block: 291833117341015
162 Block: 291833117341016
163 Block: 291833117342000
164 Block: 291833117342001
165 Block: 291833117342002
166 Block: 291833117342003
167 Block: 291833117342004
168 Block: 291833117342005
169 Block: 291833117342006
170 Block: 291833117342007
171 Block: 291833117342008
172 Block: 291833117342009
173 Block: 291833117342010
174 Block: 291833117342011
175 Block: 291833117342012
176 Block: 291833117342013
177 Block: 291833117342014
178 Block: 291833117342015
179 Block: 291833117342016
180 Block: 291833117342017
181 Block: 291833117343000
182 Block: 291833117343001
183 Block: 291833117343002
184 Block: 291833117343003
185 Block: 291833117343004
186 Block: 291833117343005
187 Block: 291833117343006
188 Block: 291833117343007
189 Block: 291833117343008
190 Block: 291833117343009
191 Block: 291833117343010
192 Block: 291833117343011
193 Block: 291833117343012
194 Block: 291833117343013
195 VTD: Lincoln

HB 2 29
196 VTD: McClay
197 VTD: McNair
198 VTD: Meadow Valley
199 VTD: Mid Rivers
200 Block: 291833115001064
201 Block: 291833115001065
202 Block: 291833115001066
203 Block: 291833115001070
204 Block: 291833115001101
205 Block: 291833115001103
206 Block: 291833115001104
207 Block: 291833115001105
208 Block: 291833115001120
209 Block: 291833115001121
210 Block: 291833124001007
211 Block: 291833124001008
212 Block: 291833124001009
213 Block: 291833124001010
214 Block: 291833124001011
215 Block: 291833124001012
216 Block: 291833124001018
217 Block: 291833124001019
218 Block: 291833124001020
219 Block: 291833124001024
220 Block: 291833124001025
221 Block: 291833124001030
222 Block: 291833124002000
223 Block: 291833124002011
224 Block: 291833124002012
225 Block: 291833124002013
226 Block: 291833124002014
227 Block: 291833124002015
228 Block: 291833124002016
229 Block: 291833124002017
230 Block: 291833124002018
231 Block: 291833124002019
232 Block: 291833124002021

HB 2 30
233 Block: 291833124002022
234 Block: 291833124002023
235 Block: 291833124002024
236 Block: 291833124002025
237 Block: 291833124002026
238 Block: 291833124002031
239 VTD: Montclair
240 VTD: Monticello
241 VTD: Oak Creek
242 VTD: Oaks
243 VTD: Parkwood
244 VTD: Pitman
245 VTD: Rabbit Run
246 VTD: River Bend
247 VTD: Salt Lick
248 Block: 291833114221000
249 Block: 291833114221003
250 Block: 291833114221004
251 Block: 291833114221005
252 Block: 291833114221006
253 Block: 291833114221007
254 Block: 291833114221008
255 Block: 291833114222001
256 Block: 291833114222002
257 Block: 291833114222003
258 Block: 291833114222004
259 Block: 291833114222007
260 Block: 291833114223000
261 Block: 291833114223001
262 Block: 291833114223003
263 Block: 291833114223004
264 Block: 291833114223006
265 Block: 291833114223007
266 Block: 291833114223008
267 Block: 291833114223009
268 Block: 291833114223020
269 Block: 291833114223021

HB 2 31
270 Block: 291833114223022
271 Block: 291833114223023
272 Block: 291833114223026
273 Block: 291833114223027
274 Block: 291833114223028
275 Block: 291833114224005
276 VTD: Shadow Creek
277 VTD: Shirewood
278 VTD: Shoshone
279 VTD: Sibley
280 VTD: Spencer
281 VTD: St. Andrews
282 VTD: St. Cletus
283 VTD: St. Jude
284 VTD: St. Marys
285 VTD: Starbuck
286 VTD: Summerset
287 VTD: Sun Lake
288 VTD: Sunny Hill
289 VTD: Sycamore
290 VTD: Tanglewood
291 VTD: Timberwood
292 VTD: Treetop
293 VTD: Truman
294 VTD: Washington
295 VTD: Weldon Spring
296 Block: 291833111141014
297 Block: 291833111141015
298 Block: 291833111141016
299 Block: 291833111141017
300 Block: 291833111141018
301 Block: 291833111141019
302 Block: 291833111141020
303 Block: 291833111142057
304 Block: 291833111142058
305 Block: 291833111142059
306 Block: 291833111142067

HB 2 32
307 Block: 291833111142068
308 Block: 291833111244005
309 Block: 291833111244006
310 Block: 291833111244009
311 Block: 291833111244010
312 Block: 291833111244011
313 Block: 291833111244012
314 Block: 291833111244013
315 Block: 291833111244014
316 Block: 291833111244015
317 Block: 291833111244016
318 Block: 291833111244017
319 Block: 291833111244018
320 Block: 291833111511006
321 Block: 291833111512024
322 VTD: Westfield
323 VTD: Wheatfield
324 VTD: Whitmoor
325 VTD: Wilshire
326 VTD: Windcastle
327 VTD: Winds
328 VTD: Wolfrum
329 VTD: Woodcliff
330 VTD: Woodglen
331 VTD: Woodstream
332 County: St. Louis MO
333 VTD: BON001
334 VTD: BON002
335 VTD: BON003
336 VTD: BON004
337 VTD: BON005
338 VTD: BON006
339 VTD: BON007
340 VTD: BON008
341 VTD: BON009
342 VTD: BON010
343 VTD: BON011

HB 2 33
344 VTD: BON012
345 VTD: BON013
346 VTD: BON014
347 VTD: BON015
348 VTD: BON016
349 VTD: BON017
350 VTD: BON018
351 VTD: BON019
352 VTD: BON020
353 VTD: BON021
354 VTD: BON022
355 VTD: BON023
356 VTD: BON024
357 VTD: BON025
358 VTD: BON026
359 VTD: BON027
360 VTD: BON028
361 VTD: BON029
362 VTD: BON030
363 VTD: BON031
364 VTD: BON032
365 VTD: BON033
366 VTD: BON034
367 VTD: BON035
368 VTD: BON036
369 VTD: BON037
370 VTD: BON038
371 VTD: BON039
372 VTD: BON040
373 VTD: BON200
374 VTD: BON202
375 VTD: BON203
376 VTD: BON205
377 VTD: BON206
378 VTD: BON207
379 VTD: BON208
380 VTD: BON210

HB 2 34
381 VTD: BON211
382 VTD: CC010
383 VTD: CC012
384 Block: 291892155001006
385 Block: 291892155001013
386 Block: 291892155004009
387 Block: 291892155004010
388 VTD: CC013
389 Block: 291892155004006
390 Block: 291892155004008
391 VTD: CC014
392 VTD: CC015
393 VTD: CC016
394 VTD: CC019
395 VTD: CC020
396 VTD: CC021
397 VTD: CC022
398 Block: 291892155004004
399 Block: 291892155004005
400 Block: 291892155004007
401 VTD: CC023
402 VTD: CC024
403 VTD: CC025
404 VTD: CC026
405 VTD: CC027
406 VTD: CC028
407 VTD: CC029
408 VTD: CC032
409 VTD: CC033
410 VTD: CC034
411 VTD: CC036
412 VTD: CC039
413 VTD: CC040
414 VTD: CC046
415 VTD: CC048
416 VTD: CC049
417 VTD: CC051

HB 2 35
418 VTD: CC052
419 VTD: CC055
420 VTD: CC059
421 VTD: CC060
422 VTD: CHE001
423 VTD: CHE002
424 VTD: CHE003
425 VTD: CHE004
426 VTD: CHE005
427 VTD: CHE006
428 VTD: CHE007
429 Block: 291892216211000
430 Block: 291892216211001
431 Block: 291892216211002
432 Block: 291892216211003
433 Block: 291892216211004
434 Block: 291892216211005
435 Block: 291892216211006
436 Block: 291892216211009
437 Block: 291892216211011
438 Block: 291892216211012
439 Block: 291892216211014
440 Block: 291892216211015
441 Block: 291892216211016
442 Block: 291892216211017
443 Block: 291892216211018
444 Block: 291892216211020
445 Block: 291892216211023
446 Block: 291892216211026
447 Block: 291892216211035
448 Block: 291892216211045
449 Block: 291892216294031
450 Block: 291892216294032
451 Block: 291892216294041
452 VTD: CHE008
453 VTD: CHE009
454 VTD: CHE010

HB 2 36
455 VTD: CHE011
456 VTD: CHE012
457 VTD: CHE013
458 VTD: CHE014
459 VTD: CHE015
460 VTD: CHE016
461 VTD: CHE017
462 VTD: CHE018
463 VTD: CHE019
464 VTD: CHE020
465 VTD: CHE021
466 VTD: CHE022
467 VTD: CHE023
468 VTD: CHE024
469 VTD: CHE025
470 VTD: CHE026
471 VTD: CHE027
472 VTD: CHE028
473 VTD: CHE029
474 VTD: CHE030
475 VTD: CHE031
476 VTD: CHE032
477 VTD: CHE033
478 VTD: CHE034
479 VTD: CHE035
480 VTD: CHE036
481 VTD: CHE037
482 VTD: CHE038
483 VTD: CHE039
484 VTD: CHE040
485 VTD: CHE041
486 VTD: CHE042
487 VTD: CHE043
488 VTD: CHE044
489 VTD: CHE045
490 VTD: CHE046
491 VTD: CHE047

HB 2 37
492 VTD: CHE048
493 VTD: CHE049
494 VTD: CHE050
495 VTD: CHE051
496 VTD: CHE052
497 VTD: CHE053
498 VTD: CHE054
499 VTD: CHE055
500 VTD: CHE057
501 VTD: CHE200
502 VTD: CHE203
503 VTD: CHE212
504 VTD: CHE214
505 VTD: CHE215
506 VTD: CLA004
507 Block: 291892154004014
508 VTD: CLA006
509 VTD: CLA007
510 VTD: CLA010
511 VTD: CLA012
512 VTD: CLA013
513 Block: 291892154003013
514 Block: 291892154003014
515 Block: 291892154004000
516 Block: 291892154004001
517 Block: 291892154004002
518 Block: 291892154004003
519 Block: 291892154004004
520 Block: 291892154004008
521 Block: 291892154004012
522 Block: 291892154004013
523 Block: 291892154005001
524 Block: 291892154005002
525 Block: 291892154005003
526 VTD: CLA014
527 VTD: CLA015
528 VTD: CLA016

HB 2 38
529 VTD: CLA021
530 VTD: CLA022
531 VTD: CLA023
532 VTD: CLA024
533 VTD: CLA025
534 VTD: CLA026
535 VTD: CLA028
536 VTD: CLA030
537 VTD: CLA031
538 VTD: CLA032
539 VTD: CLA033
540 VTD: CLA034
541 VTD: CLA035
542 VTD: CLA036
543 VTD: CLA037
544 VTD: CLA038
545 VTD: CLA039
546 VTD: CLA040
547 VTD: CLA041
548 VTD: CLA042
549 VTD: CLA045
550 VTD: CLA046
551 VTD: CLA047
552 VTD: CLA049
553 VTD: CLA050
554 VTD: CLA051
555 VTD: CLA200
556 VTD: CLA201
557 VTD: CLA202
558 VTD: CLA203
559 VTD: CLA205
560 VTD: CLA206
561 VTD: CON001
562 VTD: CON002
563 VTD: CON003
564 VTD: CON004
565 VTD: CON005

HB 2 39
566 VTD: CON006
567 VTD: CON007
568 VTD: CON008
569 VTD: CON009
570 VTD: CON010
571 VTD: CON011
572 VTD: CON012
573 VTD: CON013
574 VTD: CON014
575 VTD: CON015
576 VTD: CON016
577 VTD: CON017
578 VTD: CON018
579 VTD: CON019
580 VTD: CON020
581 VTD: CON021
582 VTD: CON022
583 VTD: CON023
584 VTD: CON024
585 VTD: CON025
586 VTD: CON026
587 VTD: CON027
588 VTD: CON028
589 VTD: CON029
590 VTD: CON030
591 VTD: CON031
592 VTD: CON032
593 VTD: CON033
594 VTD: CON034
595 VTD: CON035
596 VTD: CON036
597 VTD: CON037
598 VTD: CON038
599 VTD: CON039
600 VTD: CON040
601 VTD: CON041
602 VTD: CON042

HB 2 40
603 VTD: CON043
604 VTD: CON044
605 VTD: CON045
606 VTD: CON046
607 VTD: CON047
608 VTD: CON048
609 VTD: CON049
610 VTD: CON050
611 VTD: CON051
612 VTD: CON052
613 VTD: CON053
614 VTD: CON200
615 VTD: CON202
616 VTD: CON204
617 VTD: CON205
618 VTD: CON206
619 VTD: CON212
620 VTD: CON213
621 VTD: GRA001
622 VTD: GRA002
623 VTD: GRA003
624 VTD: GRA004
625 VTD: GRA005
626 VTD: GRA006
627 VTD: GRA007
628 VTD: GRA008
629 VTD: GRA009
630 VTD: GRA010
631 VTD: GRA011
632 VTD: GRA012
633 VTD: GRA013
634 VTD: GRA014
635 VTD: GRA015
636 VTD: GRA016
637 VTD: GRA017
638 VTD: GRA018
639 VTD: GRA019

HB 2 41
640 VTD: GRA020
641 VTD: GRA021
642 VTD: GRA022
643 VTD: GRA023
644 VTD: GRA024
645 VTD: GRA025
646 VTD: GRA026
647 VTD: GRA027
648 VTD: GRA028
649 VTD: GRA029
650 VTD: GRA030
651 VTD: GRA031
652 VTD: GRA032
653 VTD: GRA033
654 VTD: GRA034
655 VTD: GRA035
656 VTD: GRA036
657 VTD: GRA037
658 VTD: GRA038
659 VTD: GRA039
660 VTD: GRA040
661 VTD: GRA041
662 VTD: GRA042
663 VTD: GRA043
664 VTD: GRA044
665 VTD: GRA045
666 VTD: GRA046
667 VTD: GRA047
668 VTD: GRA048
669 VTD: GRA201
670 VTD: GRA202
671 VTD: GRA206
672 VTD: GRA209
673 VTD: GRA210
674 VTD: HAD006
675 VTD: HAD007
676 VTD: HAD024

HB 2 42
677 VTD: HAD030
678 Block: 291892170004021
679 VTD: HAD031
680 VTD: HAD200
681 VTD: JEF001
682 VTD: JEF002
683 VTD: JEF003
684 VTD: JEF004
685 VTD: JEF005
686 VTD: JEF006
687 VTD: JEF007
688 VTD: JEF008
689 VTD: JEF009
690 VTD: JEF010
691 VTD: JEF011
692 VTD: JEF012
693 VTD: JEF013
694 VTD: JEF014
695 VTD: JEF015
696 VTD: JEF016
697 VTD: JEF017
698 VTD: JEF018
699 VTD: JEF019
700 VTD: JEF020
701 VTD: JEF021
702 VTD: JEF022
703 VTD: JEF023
704 VTD: JEF024
705 VTD: JEF025
706 VTD: JEF026
707 VTD: JEF027
708 VTD: JEF028
709 VTD: JEF029
710 VTD: JEF030
711 VTD: JEF031
712 VTD: JEF032
713 VTD: JEF033

HB 2 43
714 VTD: JEF034
715 VTD: JEF035
716 VTD: JEF036
717 VTD: JEF037
718 VTD: JEF200
719 VTD: JEF202
720 VTD: LAF001
721 VTD: LAF002
722 VTD: LAF003
723 VTD: LAF004
724 VTD: LAF005
725 VTD: LAF006
726 VTD: LAF007
727 VTD: LAF008
728 VTD: LAF009
729 VTD: LAF010
730 VTD: LAF011
731 VTD: LAF012
732 VTD: LAF013
733 VTD: LAF014
734 VTD: LAF015
735 VTD: LAF016
736 VTD: LAF017
737 VTD: LAF018
738 VTD: LAF019
739 VTD: LAF020
740 VTD: LAF022
741 VTD: LAF023
742 VTD: LAF024
743 VTD: LAF025
744 VTD: LAF026
745 VTD: LAF027
746 VTD: LAF028
747 VTD: LAF029
748 VTD: LAF030
749 VTD: LAF031
750 VTD: LAF032

HB 2 44
751 VTD: LAF033
752 VTD: LAF034
753 VTD: LAF035
754 VTD: LAF036
755 VTD: LAF037
756 VTD: LAF038
757 VTD: LAF039
758 VTD: LAF040
759 VTD: LAF041
760 VTD: LAF042
761 VTD: LAF043
762 VTD: LAF044
763 VTD: LAF045
764 VTD: LAF046
765 VTD: LAF200
766 VTD: LAF205
767 VTD: LAF207
768 VTD: LEM001
769 VTD: LEM002
770 VTD: LEM003
771 VTD: LEM004
772 VTD: LEM005
773 VTD: LEM006
774 VTD: LEM007
775 Block: 291892201011000
776 Block: 291892201011001
777 Block: 291892201011011
778 Block: 291892201011014
779 Block: 291892201011015
780 Block: 291892201011016
781 Block: 291892201011018
782 Block: 291892201011020
783 Block: 291892201011031
784 Block: 291892201011032
785 Block: 291892201011033
786 Block: 291892201011034
787 Block: 291892201011035

HB 2 45
788 Block: 291892201011036
789 Block: 291892201011037
790 Block: 291892201011038
791 Block: 291892201011039
792 Block: 291892201011040
793 Block: 291892201011041
794 Block: 291892201011042
795 Block: 291892201011043
796 Block: 291892201011044
797 Block: 291892201012000
798 Block: 291892201012001
799 Block: 291892201012002
800 Block: 291892201012003
801 Block: 291892201012004
802 Block: 291892201012005
803 Block: 291892201012008
804 Block: 291892201021006
805 Block: 291892201021007
806 Block: 291892201021008
807 Block: 291892201021018
808 Block: 291892202001001
809 Block: 291892202001003
810 Block: 291892202001004
811 Block: 291892202001005
812 Block: 291892202001006
813 Block: 291892202001007
814 Block: 291892202001008
815 Block: 291892202001009
816 Block: 291892202001010
817 Block: 291892202001011
818 Block: 291892202001012
819 Block: 291892202001013
820 Block: 291892202001014
821 Block: 291892202005000
822 Block: 291892202005001
823 Block: 291892202005002
824 VTD: LEM008

HB 2 46
825 VTD: LEM009
826 VTD: LEM010
827 VTD: LEM011
828 VTD: LEM012
829 VTD: LEM013
830 VTD: LEM014
831 VTD: LEM015
832 VTD: LEM016
833 VTD: LEM017
834 VTD: LEM018
835 VTD: LEM019
836 VTD: LEM020
837 VTD: LEM021
838 VTD: LEM022
839 VTD: LEM023
840 VTD: LEM024
841 VTD: LEM025
842 VTD: LEM026
843 VTD: LEM027
844 VTD: LEM028
845 VTD: LEM029
846 VTD: LEM030
847 VTD: LEM031
848 VTD: LEM032
849 VTD: LEM033
850 VTD: LEM200
851 VTD: LEM201
852 VTD: LEM202
853 VTD: LEM204
854 VTD: LEM205
855 VTD: LEM208
856 VTD: MER001
857 VTD: MER002
858 VTD: MER003
859 VTD: MER004
860 VTD: MER005
861 VTD: MER006

HB 2 47
862 VTD: MER007
863 VTD: MER008
864 VTD: MER009
865 VTD: MER010
866 VTD: MER011
867 VTD: MER012
868 VTD: MER013
869 VTD: MER014
870 VTD: MER015
871 VTD: MER016
872 Block: 291892215031020
873 Block: 291892215031022
874 Block: 291892215031023
875 Block: 291892215031084
876 Block: 291892215031085
877 Block: 291892215031095
878 Block: 291892215031096
879 VTD: MER017
880 VTD: MER018
881 VTD: MER019
882 VTD: MER020
883 VTD: MER021
884 VTD: MER022
885 VTD: MER023
886 VTD: MER024
887 VTD: MER025
888 VTD: MER026
889 VTD: MER027
890 VTD: MER028
891 VTD: MER029
892 VTD: MER030
893 VTD: MER031
894 VTD: MER032
895 VTD: MER033
896 VTD: MER034
897 VTD: MER035
898 VTD: MER036

HB 2 48
899 VTD: MER037
900 VTD: MER038
901 VTD: MER039
902 VTD: MER040
903 VTD: MER041
904 VTD: MER042
905 VTD: MER043
906 VTD: MER044
907 VTD: MER045
908 VTD: MER046
909 VTD: MER047
910 VTD: MER048
911 VTD: MER200
912 VTD: MER202
913 VTD: MER204
914 VTD: MER207
915 VTD: MER209
916 VTD: MER210
917 VTD: MER213
918 VTD: MER214
919 VTD: MER215
920 VTD: MER219
921 VTD: MHT001
922 VTD: MHT002
923 VTD: MHT003
924 VTD: MHT004
925 VTD: MHT005
926 VTD: MHT007
927 VTD: MHT009
928 VTD: MHT016
929 VTD: MHT019
930 VTD: MHT024
931 VTD: MHT026
932 VTD: MHT027
933 VTD: MHT030
934 VTD: MHT035
935 VTD: MHT039

HB 2 49
936 VTD: MHT050
937 VTD: MHT051
938 VTD: MHT053
939 VTD: MHT054
940 VTD: MHT055
941 VTD: MHT056
942 VTD: MHT207
943 VTD: MHT208
944 VTD: MHT212
945 VTD: MHT213
946 VTD: MHT214
947 VTD: MHT219
948 VTD: MHT223
949 VTD: MID029
950 VTD: MID039
951 Block: 291892155004002
952 Block: 291892155004003
953 VTD: MR001
954 VTD: MR002
955 VTD: MR003
956 VTD: MR004
957 VTD: MR005
958 VTD: MR006
959 VTD: MR007
960 VTD: MR008
961 VTD: MR009
962 VTD: MR010
963 VTD: MR011
964 VTD: MR012
965 VTD: MR013
966 VTD: MR014
967 VTD: MR015
968 VTD: MR016
969 VTD: MR017
970 VTD: MR018
971 VTD: MR019
972 VTD: MR020

HB 2 50
973 VTD: MR021
974 VTD: MR022
975 VTD: MR023
976 VTD: MR024
977 VTD: MR025
978 VTD: MR026
979 VTD: MR027
980 VTD: MR028
981 VTD: MR029
982 VTD: MR030
983 VTD: MR031
984 VTD: MR032
985 VTD: MR033
986 VTD: MR034
987 VTD: MR035
988 VTD: MR036
989 VTD: MR037
990 VTD: MR038
991 VTD: MR039
992 VTD: MR040
993 VTD: MR041
994 VTD: MR042
995 VTD: MR043
996 VTD: MR044
997 VTD: MR045
998 VTD: MR046
999 VTD: MR047
1000 VTD: MR048
1001 VTD: MR049
1002 VTD: MR050
1003 VTD: MR051
1004 VTD: MR052
1005 VTD: MR053
1006 VTD: MR054
1007 VTD: MR055
1008 VTD: MR056
1009 VTD: MR057

HB 2 51
1010 VTD: MR058
1011 VTD: MR059
1012 VTD: MR200
1013 VTD: MR202
1014 VTD: MR203
1015 VTD: MR204
1016 VTD: MR205
1017 VTD: MR209
1018 VTD: MR210
1019 VTD: MR212
1020 VTD: MR213
1021 VTD: OAK001
1022 VTD: OAK002
1023 VTD: OAK003
1024 VTD: OAK004
1025 VTD: OAK005
1026 VTD: OAK006
1027 VTD: OAK007
1028 VTD: OAK008
1029 VTD: OAK009
1030 VTD: OAK010
1031 VTD: OAK011
1032 VTD: OAK012
1033 VTD: OAK013
1034 VTD: OAK014
1035 VTD: OAK015
1036 VTD: OAK016
1037 VTD: OAK017
1038 VTD: OAK018
1039 VTD: OAK019
1040 VTD: OAK020
1041 VTD: OAK021
1042 VTD: OAK022
1043 VTD: OAK023
1044 VTD: OAK024
1045 VTD: OAK025
1046 VTD: OAK026

HB 2 52
1047 VTD: OAK027
1048 VTD: OAK028
1049 VTD: OAK029
1050 VTD: QUE001
1051 VTD: QUE002
1052 VTD: QUE003
1053 VTD: QUE004
1054 VTD: QUE005
1055 VTD: QUE006
1056 VTD: QUE007
1057 VTD: QUE008
1058 VTD: QUE009
1059 VTD: QUE010
1060 VTD: QUE011
1061 VTD: QUE012
1062 VTD: QUE013
1063 VTD: QUE014
1064 VTD: QUE015
1065 VTD: QUE016
1066 VTD: QUE017
1067 VTD: QUE018
1068 VTD: QUE019
1069 VTD: QUE020
1070 VTD: QUE021
1071 VTD: QUE022
1072 VTD: QUE023
1073 VTD: QUE024
1074 VTD: QUE025
1075 VTD: QUE026
1076 VTD: QUE027
1077 VTD: QUE028
1078 VTD: QUE029
1079 VTD: QUE030
1080 VTD: QUE031
1081 VTD: QUE032
1082 VTD: QUE033
1083 VTD: QUE034

HB 2 53
1084 VTD: QUE035
1085 VTD: QUE036
1086 VTD: QUE037
1087 VTD: QUE038
1088 VTD: QUE039
1089 VTD: QUE040
1090 VTD: QUE041
1091 VTD: QUE042
1092 VTD: QUE043
1093 VTD: QUE044
1094 VTD: QUE045
1095 VTD: QUE046
1096 VTD: QUE047
1097 VTD: QUE048
1098 VTD: QUE049
1099 VTD: QUE200
1100 VTD: QUE201
1101 VTD: QUE202
1102 VTD: QUE203
1103 VTD: QUE204
1104 VTD: QUE205
1105 VTD: QUE207
1106 VTD: QUE208
1107 VTD: QUE209
1108 VTD: QUE210
1109 VTD: QUE211
1110 VTD: QUE213
1111 VTD: TSF001
1112 VTD: TSF002
1113 VTD: TSF003
1114 VTD: TSF004
1115 VTD: TSF005
1116 VTD: TSF006
1117 VTD: TSF007
1118 VTD: TSF008
1119 VTD: TSF009
1120 VTD: TSF010

HB 2 54
1121 VTD: TSF011
1122 VTD: TSF012
1123 VTD: TSF013
1124 VTD: TSF014
1125 VTD: TSF015
1126 VTD: TSF016
1127 VTD: TSF017
1128 VTD: TSF018
1129 VTD: TSF019
1130 VTD: TSF020
1131 VTD: TSF021
1132 VTD: TSF022
1133 VTD: TSF023
1134 VTD: TSF024
1135 VTD: TSF025
1136 VTD: TSF026
1137 VTD: TSF027
1138 VTD: TSF201
1139 VTD: WH001
1140 VTD: WH002
1141 VTD: WH003
1142 VTD: WH004
1143 VTD: WH005
1144 VTD: WH006
1145 VTD: WH007
1146 VTD: WH008
1147 VTD: WH009
1148 VTD: WH010
1149 VTD: WH011
1150 VTD: WH012
1151 VTD: WH013
1152 VTD: WH014
1153 VTD: WH015
1154 VTD: WH016
1155 VTD: WH017
1156 VTD: WH018
1157 VTD: WH019

HB 2 55
1158 VTD: WH020
1159 VTD: WH021
1160 VTD: WH022
1161 VTD: WH023
1162 VTD: WH024
1163 VTD: WH025
1164 VTD: WH026
1165 VTD: WH027
1166 VTD: WH028
1167 VTD: WH029
1168 VTD: WH030
1169 VTD: WH031
1170 VTD: WH032
1171 VTD: WH033
1172 VTD: WH034
1173 VTD: WH035
1174 VTD: WH036
1175 VTD: WH037
1176 VTD: WH038
1177 VTD: WH039
1178 VTD: WH040
1179 VTD: WH041
1180 VTD: WH042
1181 VTD: WH043
1182 VTD: WH044
1183 VTD: WH045
1184 VTD: WH046
1185 VTD: WH047
1186 VTD: WH200
1187 VTD: WH201
1188 VTD: WH202
1189 VTD: WH203
1190 VTD: WH208
128.473. The third congressional district shall be composed of the following:
2 County: Audrain MO
3 County: Boone MO
4 County: Callaway MO

HB 2 56
5 County: Cole MO
6 County: Franklin MO
7 County: Gasconade MO
8 County: Lincoln MO
9 County: Maries MO
10 County: Miller MO
11 VTD: BRUMLEY
12 Block: 291319625012012
13 Block: 291319625012013
14 Block: 291319625012014
15 Block: 291319625012020
16 Block: 291319625012021
17 Block: 291319625012022
18 Block: 291319625012023
19 Block: 291319625012024
20 Block: 291319625012025
21 Block: 291319625012045
22 Block: 291319625012046
23 Block: 291319625012052
24 Block: 291319628012022
25 Block: 291319628012025
26 Block: 291319628012026
27 Block: 291319628012027
28 Block: 291319628012028
29 Block: 291319628012045
30 Block: 291319628012046
31 Block: 291319628012047
32 Block: 291319628012048
33 Block: 291319628012049
34 Block: 291319628012050
35 Block: 291319628012051
36 Block: 291319628012052
37 Block: 291319628012053
38 Block: 291319628012054
39 Block: 291319628012055
40 Block: 291319628012056
41 Block: 291319628021169

HB 2 57
42 Block: 291319628021176
43 Block: 291319628021177
44 Block: 291319628021178
45 Block: 291319628021179
46 Block: 291319628022021
47 Block: 291319628022022
48 Block: 291319628022023
49 Block: 291319628022029
50 Block: 291319628022030
51 Block: 291319628022031
52 Block: 291319628022032
53 Block: 291319628022033
54 Block: 291319628022034
55 Block: 291319628022035
56 Block: 291319628022036
57 Block: 291319628022037
58 Block: 291319628022038
59 Block: 291319628022039
60 Block: 291319628022040
61 Block: 291319628022041
62 Block: 291319628022042
63 Block: 291319628022043
64 Block: 291319628022044
65 Block: 291319628022045
66 Block: 291319628022046
67 Block: 291319628022047
68 Block: 291319628022048
69 Block: 291319628022049
70 Block: 291319628022050
71 Block: 291319628022051
72 Block: 291319628022052
73 Block: 291319628022056
74 Block: 291319628022057
75 Block: 291319628022058
76 Block: 291319628022059
77 Block: 291319628022060
78 Block: 291319628022061

HB 2 58
79 Block: 291319628022062
80 Block: 291319628022063
81 Block: 291319628022064
82 Block: 291319628022065
83 Block: 291319628022066
84 Block: 291319628022067
85 Block: 291319628022068
86 Block: 291319628022070
87 Block: 291319628022071
88 Block: 291319628022072
89 Block: 291319628022073
90 Block: 291319628022074
91 Block: 291319628022075
92 Block: 291319628022076
93 Block: 291319628022077
94 Block: 291319628022078
95 Block: 291319628022079
96 Block: 291319628022080
97 Block: 291319628022081
98 Block: 291319628022082
99 Block: 291319628022083
100 Block: 291319628022084
101 Block: 291319628022085
102 Block: 291319628022086
103 Block: 291319628022087
104 Block: 291319628022088
105 Block: 291319628022090
106 Block: 291319628022091
107 Block: 291319628022092
108 Block: 291319628022093
109 Block: 291319628022094
110 Block: 291319628022095
111 Block: 291319628022096
112 Block: 291319628022097
113 Block: 291319628022098
114 Block: 291319628022099
115 Block: 291319628022100

HB 2 59
116 Block: 291319628022101
117 Block: 291319628022102
118 Block: 291319628022103
119 Block: 291319628022104
120 Block: 291319628022105
121 Block: 291319628022106
122 VTD: ELDON CITY
123 VTD: ELDON NORTH
124 VTD: ELDON SOUTH
125 Block: 291319626002032
126 Block: 291319626002033
127 Block: 291319626002034
128 Block: 291319626002035
129 Block: 291319626002036
130 Block: 291319626002045
131 Block: 291319627021047
132 Block: 291319627021050
133 Block: 291319627021051
134 Block: 291319627021052
135 Block: 291319627021053
136 Block: 291319627021054
137 Block: 291319627021055
138 Block: 291319627021056
139 Block: 291319627021057
140 Block: 291319627021058
141 Block: 291319627021063
142 Block: 291319627021067
143 Block: 291319627021068
144 Block: 291319627021069
145 Block: 291319627021070
146 Block: 291319627021071
147 Block: 291319627021072
148 Block: 291319627021073
149 Block: 291319627021074
150 Block: 291319627021075
151 Block: 291319627021076
152 Block: 291319627021077

HB 2 60
153 Block: 291319627021078
154 Block: 291319627021079
155 Block: 291319627021080
156 Block: 291319627021081
157 Block: 291319627021083
158 Block: 291319627021084
159 Block: 291319627021085
160 Block: 291319627021097
161 Block: 291319627021098
162 Block: 291319627021099
163 Block: 291319627021100
164 Block: 291319627021101
165 Block: 291319627021102
166 Block: 291319627021104
167 Block: 291319627021105
168 Block: 291319627021106
169 Block: 291319627021107
170 Block: 291319627021108
171 Block: 291319627021109
172 Block: 291319627021111
173 Block: 291319627021119
174 Block: 291319627021123
175 Block: 291319627021124
176 Block: 291319627021125
177 Block: 291319627021126
178 Block: 291319627021127
179 Block: 291319627021128
180 Block: 291319627021129
181 Block: 291319627021130
182 Block: 291319627021131
183 Block: 291319627021132
184 Block: 291319627021133
185 Block: 291319627021134
186 Block: 291319627021135
187 Block: 291319627021136
188 Block: 291319627021137
189 Block: 291319627021138

HB 2 61
190 Block: 291319627021139
191 Block: 291319627021140
192 Block: 291319627021141
193 Block: 291319627021142
194 Block: 291319627021143
195 Block: 291319627021144
196 Block: 291319627021145
197 Block: 291319627021146
198 Block: 291319627021147
199 Block: 291319627021148
200 Block: 291319627021149
201 Block: 291319627021150
202 Block: 291319627021151
203 Block: 291319627021152
204 Block: 291319627021153
205 Block: 291319627021154
206 Block: 291319627021155
207 Block: 291319627021158
208 Block: 291319627021159
209 Block: 291319627021160
210 Block: 291319627021161
211 Block: 291319627021162
212 Block: 291319627021163
213 Block: 291319627021164
214 Block: 291319627021165
215 Block: 291319627021166
216 Block: 291319627021167
217 Block: 291319627021168
218 Block: 291319627021169
219 Block: 291319627021170
220 Block: 291319627021171
221 Block: 291319627021173
222 Block: 291319628021048
223 Block: 291319628021049
224 Block: 291319628021050
225 Block: 291319628021051
226 Block: 291319628021052

HB 2 62
227 Block: 291319628021066
228 Block: 291319628021067
229 Block: 291319628021068
230 Block: 291319628021069
231 Block: 291319628021070
232 Block: 291319628021071
233 Block: 291319628021072
234 Block: 291319628021073
235 Block: 291319628021074
236 Block: 291319628021075
237 Block: 291319628021076
238 Block: 291319628021083
239 Block: 291319628021084
240 Block: 291319628021085
241 Block: 291319628021088
242 Block: 291319628021089
243 Block: 291319628021090
244 Block: 291319628021091
245 Block: 291319628021092
246 Block: 291319628021093
247 Block: 291319628021116
248 Block: 291319628021117
249 Block: 291319629011044
250 Block: 291319629012038
251 VTD: IBERIA CITY & RURAL
252 VTD: MARYS HOME
253 VTD: OLEAN
254 VTD: ST. ANTHONY
255 VTD: ST.ELIZABETH
256 VTD: TUSCUMBIA
257 Block: 291319625012000
258 Block: 291319625012001
259 Block: 291319625012011
260 Block: 291319625012015
261 Block: 291319625021041
262 Block: 291319625021042
263 Block: 291319625021043

HB 2 63
264 Block: 291319625021044
265 Block: 291319625021059
266 Block: 291319625023019
267 Block: 291319625023021
268 Block: 291319625023023
269 Block: 291319625023024
270 Block: 291319625023025
271 Block: 291319625023027
272 Block: 291319625023028
273 Block: 291319625023029
274 Block: 291319625023030
275 Block: 291319625023033
276 Block: 291319625023046
277 Block: 291319625023047
278 Block: 291319625023048
279 Block: 291319625023050
280 Block: 291319625023051
281 Block: 291319625023055
282 Block: 291319625023056
283 Block: 291319625023059
284 Block: 291319625023061
285 Block: 291319625023062
286 Block: 291319625023063
287 Block: 291319625023064
288 Block: 291319625023068
289 Block: 291319625023086
290 Block: 291319625023110
291 Block: 291319625023111
292 Block: 291319625023112
293 Block: 291319625023116
294 Block: 291319625023119
295 Block: 291319625023120
296 Block: 291319625023121
297 Block: 291319625023123
298 Block: 291319625023124
299 Block: 291319625023125
300 Block: 291319626002046

HB 2 64
301 Block: 291319626002047
302 Block: 291319626002049
303 Block: 291319626002050
304 Block: 291319626002051
305 Block: 291319626002052
306 Block: 291319626002053
307 Block: 291319626002054
308 Block: 291319626003086
309 Block: 291319626003090
310 Block: 291319626003091
311 Block: 291319626003092
312 Block: 291319627021156
313 Block: 291319627021157
314 Block: 291319628021003
315 Block: 291319628021006
316 Block: 291319628021007
317 Block: 291319628021008
318 Block: 291319628021009
319 Block: 291319628021010
320 Block: 291319628021011
321 Block: 291319628021012
322 Block: 291319628021013
323 Block: 291319628021014
324 Block: 291319628021015
325 Block: 291319628021016
326 Block: 291319628021017
327 Block: 291319628021018
328 Block: 291319628021019
329 Block: 291319628021020
330 Block: 291319628021021
331 Block: 291319628021022
332 Block: 291319628021023
333 Block: 291319628021024
334 Block: 291319628021025
335 Block: 291319628021026
336 Block: 291319628021027
337 Block: 291319628021028

HB 2 65
338 Block: 291319628021029
339 Block: 291319628021030
340 Block: 291319628021031
341 Block: 291319628021032
342 Block: 291319628021033
343 Block: 291319628021034
344 Block: 291319628021035
345 Block: 291319628021036
346 Block: 291319628021037
347 Block: 291319628021038
348 Block: 291319628021039
349 Block: 291319628021040
350 Block: 291319628021041
351 Block: 291319628021042
352 Block: 291319628021043
353 Block: 291319628021044
354 Block: 291319628021045
355 Block: 291319628021046
356 Block: 291319628021047
357 Block: 291319628021053
358 Block: 291319628021054
359 Block: 291319628021055
360 Block: 291319628021056
361 Block: 291319628021057
362 Block: 291319628021058
363 Block: 291319628021059
364 Block: 291319628021060
365 Block: 291319628021061
366 Block: 291319628021062
367 Block: 291319628021063
368 Block: 291319628021064
369 Block: 291319628021065
370 Block: 291319628021077
371 Block: 291319628021078
372 Block: 291319628021079
373 Block: 291319628021080
374 Block: 291319628021081

HB 2 66
375 Block: 291319628021082
376 Block: 291319628021094
377 Block: 291319628021095
378 Block: 291319628021096
379 Block: 291319628021097
380 Block: 291319628021098
381 Block: 291319628021099
382 Block: 291319628021100
383 Block: 291319628021101
384 Block: 291319628021102
385 Block: 291319628021103
386 Block: 291319628021104
387 Block: 291319628021152
388 Block: 291319628021153
389 Block: 291319628021154
390 Block: 291319628021155
391 Block: 291319628021156
392 Block: 291319628021157
393 Block: 291319628021158
394 Block: 291319628021159
395 Block: 291319628021160
396 Block: 291319628021161
397 Block: 291319628021162
398 Block: 291319628021163
399 Block: 291319628021164
400 Block: 291319628021165
401 Block: 291319628021166
402 Block: 291319628021167
403 Block: 291319628021168
404 Block: 291319628021170
405 Block: 291319628021171
406 Block: 291319628021172
407 Block: 291319628021173
408 Block: 291319628021174
409 Block: 291319628021175
410 Block: 291319628021180
411 Block: 291319628021182

HB 2 67
412 Block: 291319628021183
413 Block: 291319628021184
414 Block: 291319628021185
415 Block: 291319628021186
416 Block: 291319628021187
417 Block: 291319628021188
418 Block: 291319628022006
419 Block: 291319628022007
420 Block: 291319628022008
421 Block: 291319628022012
422 Block: 291319628022017
423 County: Montgomery MO
424 County: Osage MO
425 County: St. Charles MO
426 VTD: Amber Meadows
427 VTD: Augusta
428 VTD: Bayfield
429 Block: 291833117321000
430 Block: 291833117321001
431 Block: 291833117321003
432 Block: 291833117321004
433 Block: 291833117325000
434 Block: 291833117325001
435 Block: 291833117325002
436 Block: 291833117325003
437 Block: 291833117325004
438 Block: 291833117325005
439 Block: 291833117325006
440 Block: 291833117325007
441 Block: 291833117325008
442 Block: 291833117325009
443 Block: 291833117325010
444 VTD: Bryan
445 VTD: Callaway
446 VTD: Cedar
447 VTD: Civic
448 VTD: Community

HB 2 68
449 VTD: Coverdell
450 Block: 291833102022008
451 Block: 291833102022009
452 Block: 291833102022010
453 Block: 291833102022011
454 Block: 291833102022012
455 Block: 291833102022013
456 Block: 291833102022014
457 Block: 291833102022026
458 Block: 291833102022032
459 Block: 291833115002022
460 Block: 291833115002023
461 Block: 291833115002024
462 Block: 291833115002025
463 Block: 291833115002027
464 Block: 291833115002028
465 Block: 291833115002029
466 VTD: Delmar
467 VTD: DuVall
468 VTD: Edgewood
469 Block: 291833102022027
470 Block: 291833102022028
471 Block: 291833115002016
472 Block: 291833115002017
473 Block: 291833115002030
474 Block: 291833115002032
475 Block: 291833115002033
476 Block: 291833115002034
477 Block: 291833115002035
478 Block: 291833115002036
479 Block: 291833115002037
480 Block: 291833115002038
481 Block: 291833115002039
482 Block: 291833115002040
483 Block: 291833115002041
484 Block: 291833115002042
485 Block: 291833115002043

HB 2 69
486 Block: 291833115002045
487 Block: 291833115002072
488 Block: 291833115002073
489 Block: 291833115002080
490 VTD: Elks
491 VTD: Evergreen
492 VTD: Fairview
493 VTD: Feise
494 VTD: Fieldcrest
495 VTD: Flint Hill
496 VTD: Foristell
497 VTD: Freymuth
498 VTD: Glengate
499 Block: 291833117381000
500 Block: 291833117381001
501 Block: 291833117381002
502 Block: 291833117381003
503 Block: 291833117381004
504 Block: 291833117381005
505 Block: 291833117381006
506 Block: 291833117381007
507 Block: 291833117381008
508 Block: 291833117381009
509 Block: 291833117381010
510 Block: 291833117381011
511 Block: 291833117381012
512 Block: 291833117381023
513 Block: 291833117381025
514 Block: 291833117382000
515 Block: 291833117382001
516 Block: 291833117382002
517 Block: 291833117382004
518 Block: 291833117382005
519 Block: 291833117382006
520 Block: 291833117382007
521 Block: 291833117382009
522 Block: 291833117382011

HB 2 70
523 Block: 291833117382012
524 Block: 291833117382014
525 Block: 291833117382015
526 Block: 291833117382016
527 Block: 291833117382017
528 Block: 291833117382018
529 Block: 291833117382019
530 Block: 291833117382020
531 Block: 291833117382021
532 Block: 291833117382022
533 Block: 291833117382023
534 Block: 291833117382025
535 VTD: Harmony
536 Block: 291833116021000
537 Block: 291833116021001
538 Block: 291833116021002
539 Block: 291833116021003
540 Block: 291833116021004
541 Block: 291833116021005
542 Block: 291833116021006
543 Block: 291833116021007
544 Block: 291833116021008
545 Block: 291833116021009
546 Block: 291833116021010
547 Block: 291833116021011
548 Block: 291833116021012
549 Block: 291833116021013
550 Block: 291833116021014
551 Block: 291833116021015
552 Block: 291833116021016
553 Block: 291833116021017
554 Block: 291833116021018
555 Block: 291833116021019
556 Block: 291833116021020
557 Block: 291833116021021
558 Block: 291833116021022
559 Block: 291833116021023

HB 2 71
560 Block: 291833116021024
561 Block: 291833116021025
562 Block: 291833116021026
563 Block: 291833116021027
564 Block: 291833116021028
565 Block: 291833116021029
566 Block: 291833116021030
567 Block: 291833116021031
568 Block: 291833116021032
569 Block: 291833116021033
570 Block: 291833116021034
571 Block: 291833116021035
572 Block: 291833116021036
573 Block: 291833116021037
574 Block: 291833116021039
575 Block: 291833116021040
576 Block: 291833116021041
577 Block: 291833116021043
578 Block: 291833116021044
579 Block: 291833116021046
580 Block: 291833116022000
581 Block: 291833116022001
582 Block: 291833116022002
583 Block: 291833116022003
584 Block: 291833116022004
585 Block: 291833116022005
586 Block: 291833116022006
587 Block: 291833116022007
588 Block: 291833116022008
589 Block: 291833116022009
590 Block: 291833116022010
591 Block: 291833116022011
592 Block: 291833116024014
593 VTD: Hawk Ridge
594 VTD: Highgrove
595 VTD: Hopewell
596 VTD: Josephville

HB 2 72
597 VTD: Kampville
598 Block: 291833101002055
599 Block: 291833101002056
600 Block: 291833101002064
601 Block: 291833101002081
602 Block: 291833101003044
603 Block: 291833101003045
604 Block: 291833101003046
605 Block: 291833101003047
606 Block: 291833101003048
607 Block: 291833101003049
608 Block: 291833101003050
609 Block: 291833101003051
610 Block: 291833101003052
611 Block: 291833101003053
612 Block: 291833101003054
613 Block: 291833101003055
614 Block: 291833101003056
615 Block: 291833101003057
616 Block: 291833101003058
617 Block: 291833101003059
618 Block: 291833101003095
619 Block: 291833101003096
620 Block: 291833101003097
621 Block: 291833101003098
622 Block: 291833101003099
623 Block: 291833101003100
624 Block: 291833102011000
625 Block: 291833102011001
626 Block: 291833102011002
627 Block: 291833102011003
628 Block: 291833102011004
629 Block: 291833102011005
630 Block: 291833102011006
631 Block: 291833102011007
632 Block: 291833102011008
633 Block: 291833102011009

HB 2 73
634 Block: 291833102011010
635 Block: 291833102011011
636 Block: 291833102011012
637 Block: 291833102011013
638 Block: 291833102011014
639 Block: 291833102011015
640 Block: 291833102011016
641 Block: 291833102011017
642 Block: 291833102011018
643 Block: 291833102011019
644 Block: 291833102011020
645 Block: 291833102011021
646 Block: 291833102011022
647 Block: 291833102011023
648 Block: 291833102011024
649 Block: 291833102011025
650 Block: 291833102011026
651 Block: 291833102011027
652 Block: 291833102011028
653 Block: 291833102011029
654 Block: 291833102011030
655 Block: 291833102011031
656 Block: 291833102011032
657 Block: 291833102011033
658 Block: 291833102011034
659 Block: 291833102011035
660 Block: 291833102011036
661 Block: 291833102011037
662 Block: 291833102011038
663 Block: 291833102011039
664 Block: 291833102011040
665 Block: 291833102011041
666 Block: 291833102011042
667 Block: 291833102011043
668 Block: 291833102011044
669 Block: 291833102011045
670 Block: 291833102011046

HB 2 74
671 Block: 291833102011047
672 Block: 291833102011048
673 Block: 291833102011049
674 Block: 291833102011050
675 Block: 291833102011051
676 Block: 291833102011052
677 Block: 291833102011053
678 Block: 291833102011054
679 Block: 291833102011055
680 Block: 291833102011056
681 Block: 291833102011057
682 Block: 291833102011058
683 Block: 291833102012000
684 Block: 291833102012001
685 Block: 291833102012002
686 Block: 291833102012003
687 Block: 291833102012004
688 Block: 291833102012005
689 Block: 291833102012006
690 Block: 291833102012007
691 Block: 291833102012008
692 Block: 291833102012009
693 Block: 291833102012010
694 Block: 291833102012011
695 Block: 291833102012012
696 Block: 291833102012013
697 Block: 291833102012014
698 Block: 291833102012015
699 Block: 291833102012016
700 Block: 291833102012017
701 Block: 291833102012018
702 Block: 291833102012019
703 Block: 291833102012020
704 Block: 291833102012021
705 Block: 291833102012022
706 Block: 291833102012023
707 Block: 291833102012024

HB 2 75
708 Block: 291833102012025
709 Block: 291833102012026
710 Block: 291833102012027
711 Block: 291833102012028
712 Block: 291833102013000
713 Block: 291833102013001
714 Block: 291833102013002
715 Block: 291833102013003
716 Block: 291833102013004
717 Block: 291833102013005
718 Block: 291833102013006
719 Block: 291833102013007
720 Block: 291833102013008
721 Block: 291833102013009
722 Block: 291833102013010
723 Block: 291833102013011
724 Block: 291833102013012
725 Block: 291833102013013
726 Block: 291833102013014
727 Block: 291833102013015
728 Block: 291833102013016
729 Block: 291833102014000
730 Block: 291833102014001
731 Block: 291833102014002
732 Block: 291833102014003
733 Block: 291833102014004
734 Block: 291833102014005
735 Block: 291833102014006
736 Block: 291833102014007
737 Block: 291833102014008
738 Block: 291833102014009
739 Block: 291833102014010
740 Block: 291833102014011
741 Block: 291833102014012
742 Block: 291833102014013
743 Block: 291833102014014
744 Block: 291833102014015

HB 2 76
745 Block: 291833102014016
746 Block: 291833102014017
747 Block: 291833102014018
748 Block: 291833102014019
749 Block: 291833102014020
750 Block: 291833102014021
751 Block: 291833102014022
752 Block: 291833102014023
753 Block: 291833102014024
754 Block: 291833102014025
755 Block: 291833102014026
756 Block: 291833102014027
757 Block: 291833102014028
758 Block: 291833102014029
759 Block: 291833102014030
760 Block: 291833115001049
761 Block: 291833115001050
762 Block: 291833115001051
763 Block: 291833115001052
764 Block: 291833115001053
765 Block: 291833115001054
766 Block: 291833115001058
767 Block: 291833115001059
768 Block: 291833115002001
769 Block: 291833115002002
770 Block: 291833115002003
771 Block: 291833115002004
772 Block: 291833115002005
773 Block: 291833115002006
774 Block: 291833115002007
775 Block: 291833115002008
776 Block: 291833115002009
777 Block: 291833115002010
778 Block: 291833115002011
779 Block: 291833115002012
780 Block: 291833115002013
781 Block: 291833115002014

HB 2 77
782 Block: 291833115002015
783 Block: 291833115002018
784 Block: 291833115002019
785 Block: 291833115002020
786 Block: 291833115002021
787 Block: 291833115002026
788 Block: 291833115002031
789 Block: 291833115002044
790 Block: 291833115002065
791 Block: 291833115002082
792 VTD: Keystone
793 VTD: Laura Hill
794 Block: 291833116021042
795 VTD: Mamelle
796 VTD: Marina
797 VTD: Mid Rivers
798 Block: 291833115001000
799 Block: 291833115001001
800 Block: 291833115001002
801 Block: 291833115001003
802 Block: 291833115001004
803 Block: 291833115001005
804 Block: 291833115001006
805 Block: 291833115001007
806 Block: 291833115001008
807 Block: 291833115001009
808 Block: 291833115001010
809 Block: 291833115001011
810 Block: 291833115001012
811 Block: 291833115001013
812 Block: 291833115001014
813 Block: 291833115001015
814 Block: 291833115001016
815 Block: 291833115001017
816 Block: 291833115001018
817 Block: 291833115001019
818 Block: 291833115001020

HB 2 78
819 Block: 291833115001021
820 Block: 291833115001022
821 Block: 291833115001023
822 Block: 291833115001024
823 Block: 291833115001025
824 Block: 291833115001026
825 Block: 291833115001027
826 Block: 291833115001028
827 Block: 291833115001029
828 Block: 291833115001030
829 Block: 291833115001031
830 Block: 291833115001032
831 Block: 291833115001033
832 Block: 291833115001034
833 Block: 291833115001035
834 Block: 291833115001036
835 Block: 291833115001037
836 Block: 291833115001038
837 Block: 291833115001039
838 Block: 291833115001040
839 Block: 291833115001041
840 Block: 291833115001042
841 Block: 291833115001043
842 Block: 291833115001044
843 Block: 291833115001045
844 Block: 291833115001046
845 Block: 291833115001047
846 Block: 291833115001048
847 Block: 291833115001067
848 Block: 291833115001068
849 Block: 291833115001069
850 Block: 291833115001071
851 Block: 291833115001072
852 Block: 291833115001073
853 Block: 291833115001074
854 Block: 291833115001075
855 Block: 291833115001076

HB 2 79
856 Block: 291833115001077
857 Block: 291833115001078
858 Block: 291833115001079
859 Block: 291833115001080
860 Block: 291833115001081
861 Block: 291833115001082
862 Block: 291833115001083
863 Block: 291833115001084
864 Block: 291833115001085
865 Block: 291833115001086
866 Block: 291833115001087
867 Block: 291833115001088
868 Block: 291833115001089
869 Block: 291833115001090
870 Block: 291833115001091
871 Block: 291833115001092
872 Block: 291833115001093
873 Block: 291833115001094
874 Block: 291833115001095
875 Block: 291833115001096
876 Block: 291833115001097
877 Block: 291833115001098
878 Block: 291833115001099
879 Block: 291833115001100
880 Block: 291833115001106
881 Block: 291833115001107
882 Block: 291833115001108
883 Block: 291833115001109
884 Block: 291833115001110
885 Block: 291833115001111
886 Block: 291833115001112
887 Block: 291833115001113
888 Block: 291833115001114
889 Block: 291833115001117
890 Block: 291833115001122
891 VTD: Montbrook
892 VTD: Morningside

HB 2 80
893 VTD: Mount Hope
894 VTD: New Melle
895 VTD: Normandy
896 VTD: Orchard Farm
897 VTD: Patriot
898 VTD: Peine
899 VTD: Phoenix
900 VTD: Pioneer
901 VTD: Regatta Bay
902 VTD: Ridgepoint
903 VTD: Rivers
904 VTD: Salt Lick
905 Block: 291833114223002
906 VTD: St. Paul
907 VTD: Turtle Creek
908 VTD: Twin Chimneys
909 VTD: Twin Oaks
910 VTD: Weldon Spring
911 Block: 291833111031009
912 Block: 291833111031010
913 Block: 291833111031011
914 Block: 291833111031012
915 Block: 291833111031013
916 Block: 291833111031014
917 Block: 291833111031015
918 Block: 291833111031016
919 Block: 291833111031017
920 Block: 291833111031018
921 Block: 291833111031019
922 Block: 291833111031020
923 Block: 291833111031021
924 Block: 291833111511008
925 Block: 291833111512011
926 Block: 291833122042000
927 Block: 291833122043000
928 Block: 291833122043001
929 Block: 291833122043007

HB 2 81
930 Block: 291833122062032
931 Block: 291833122062039
932 Block: 291839800001007
933 Block: 291839800001008
934 Block: 291839800001009
935 Block: 291839800001010
936 Block: 291839800001011
937 Block: 291839800001012
938 Block: 291839800001013
939 Block: 291839800001014
940 Block: 291839800001015
941 Block: 291839800001016
942 Block: 291839800001017
943 Block: 291839800001018
944 Block: 291839800001019
945 Block: 291839800001020
946 Block: 291839800001021
947 Block: 291839800001022
948 Block: 291839800001023
949 Block: 291839800001024
950 Block: 291839800001025
951 Block: 291839800001026
952 Block: 291839800001027
953 Block: 291839800001028
954 Block: 291839800001029
955 Block: 291839800001030
956 Block: 291839800001031
957 Block: 291839800001032
958 Block: 291839800001033
959 Block: 291839800001035
960 Block: 291839800001036
961 Block: 291839800001040
962 Block: 291839800001042
963 County: St. Louis MO
964 VTD: CHE007
965 Block: 291892216294033
966 VTD: MER016

HB 2 82
967 Block: 291892215031075
968 Block: 291892215031082
969 Block: 291892215031083
970 County: Warren MO
128.474. The fourth congressional district shall be composed of the following:
2 County: Barton MO
3 County: Bates MO
4 County: Benton MO
5 County: Camden MO
6 County: Cass MO
7 County: Cedar MO
8 County: Cooper MO
9 County: Crawford MO
10 VTD: Cherryville
11 Block: 290554502001018
12 Block: 290554502001019
13 Block: 290554502001020
14 Block: 290554502001022
15 Block: 290554502001024
16 Block: 290554502001048
17 Block: 290554502001049
18 Block: 290554502001050
19 Block: 290554502001065
20 Block: 290554502001066
21 Block: 290554502001067
22 Block: 290554502003011
23 Block: 290554502003024
24 Block: 290554502003025
25 Block: 290554502003026
26 Block: 290554502003027
27 Block: 290554502003028
28 Block: 290554502003029
29 Block: 290554502003030
30 Block: 290554502003031
31 Block: 290554502003032
32 Block: 290554502003033
33 Block: 290554502003034

HB 2 83
34 Block: 290554502003035
35 Block: 290554502003037
36 Block: 290554502003038
37 Block: 290554502003044
38 Block: 290554502003045
39 Block: 290554502003046
40 Block: 290554502003057
41 Block: 290554502003058
42 Block: 290554502003059
43 Block: 290554502003060
44 Block: 290554504021035
45 Block: 290554504021036
46 Block: 290554504022008
47 Block: 290554504022075
48 Block: 290554504022083
49 Block: 290554504022084
50 Block: 290554504022086
51 Block: 290554504022087
52 Block: 290554504022088
53 Block: 290554504022089
54 Block: 290554504022090
55 VTD: Cook Station
56 VTD: Davisville
57 Block: 290554502001069
58 VTD: Keysville
59 County: Dade MO
60 County: Dallas MO
61 County: Dent MO
62 County: Douglas MO
63 County: Henry MO
64 County: Hickory MO
65 County: Howard MO
66 VTD: Boonslick
67 VTD: Chariton
68 Block: 290899602001056
69 Block: 290899602001057
70 VTD: Franklin

HB 2 84
71 VTD: Moniteau
72 VTD: Richmond
73 Block: 290899602001006
74 Block: 290899602001023
75 Block: 290899602001024
76 Block: 290899602001025
77 Block: 290899602001026
78 Block: 290899602001027
79 Block: 290899603001129
80 Block: 290899603001134
81 Block: 290899603001135
82 Block: 290899603001136
83 Block: 290899603001137
84 Block: 290899603001138
85 Block: 290899603001139
86 Block: 290899603001140
87 Block: 290899603001141
88 Block: 290899603001142
89 Block: 290899603001143
90 Block: 290899603001156
91 Block: 290899603001157
92 County: Johnson MO
93 County: Laclede MO
94 County: Lafayette MO
95 County: Miller MO
96 VTD: BRUMLEY
97 Block: 291319628012029
98 Block: 291319628012035
99 Block: 291319628012036
100 Block: 291319628012038
101 Block: 291319628012041
102 Block: 291319628012042
103 Block: 291319628012057
104 Block: 291319628022069
105 Block: 291319628022089
106 VTD: ELDON SOUTH
107 Block: 291319628021086

HB 2 85
108 Block: 291319628021105
109 Block: 291319628021106
110 Block: 291319628021107
111 Block: 291319628021108
112 Block: 291319628021109
113 Block: 291319628021110
114 Block: 291319628021111
115 Block: 291319628021113
116 Block: 291319628021114
117 Block: 291319628021121
118 Block: 291319628021122
119 Block: 291319628021123
120 Block: 291319628021124
121 Block: 291319628021133
122 Block: 291319628021134
123 Block: 291319628021136
124 Block: 291319628021150
125 Block: 291319628021151
126 VTD: KAISER
127 VTD: LAKE OZARK
128 VTD: TUSCUMBIA
129 Block: 291319628021087
130 Block: 291319628022018
131 County: Moniteau MO
132 County: Morgan MO
133 County: Pettis MO
134 County: Phelps MO
135 County: Polk MO
136 VTD: Campbell
137 VTD: Cliquot
138 VTD: East Madison
139 VTD: Flemington
140 VTD: Jefferson
141 VTD: Johnson
142 VTD: McKinley
143 VTD: Mooney
144 VTD: North Benton

HB 2 86
145 VTD: North Greene
146 VTD: Northeast Marion
147 Block: 291679602011092
148 Block: 291679602011093
149 Block: 291679602011094
150 Block: 291679602011109
151 Block: 291679602011110
152 Block: 291679602011111
153 Block: 291679602011114
154 Block: 291679602012129
155 Block: 291679602012130
156 Block: 291679602012131
157 Block: 291679602012132
158 Block: 291679602021003
159 Block: 291679602021004
160 Block: 291679602021005
161 Block: 291679602021006
162 Block: 291679602021007
163 Block: 291679602021008
164 Block: 291679602021009
165 Block: 291679602021010
166 Block: 291679602021011
167 Block: 291679602021012
168 Block: 291679602021013
169 Block: 291679602021014
170 Block: 291679602021015
171 Block: 291679602021016
172 Block: 291679602021017
173 Block: 291679602021018
174 Block: 291679602021019
175 Block: 291679602021020
176 Block: 291679602021021
177 Block: 291679602021022
178 Block: 291679602021023
179 Block: 291679602021024
180 Block: 291679602021025
181 Block: 291679602021027

HB 2 87
182 Block: 291679602021028
183 Block: 291679602021029
184 Block: 291679602021030
185 Block: 291679602021031
186 Block: 291679602021032
187 Block: 291679602021033
188 Block: 291679602021037
189 Block: 291679602021038
190 Block: 291679602021039
191 Block: 291679602021040
192 Block: 291679602021041
193 Block: 291679602021042
194 Block: 291679602021053
195 Block: 291679602021054
196 Block: 291679602021064
197 Block: 291679602021065
198 Block: 291679602022000
199 Block: 291679602022001
200 Block: 291679602022003
201 Block: 291679602022004
202 Block: 291679602023000
203 Block: 291679602023001
204 Block: 291679602023002
205 Block: 291679602023003
206 Block: 291679602023005
207 Block: 291679602023006
208 VTD: Northwest Marion
209 Block: 291679601012090
210 Block: 291679601012091
211 Block: 291679601012093
212 Block: 291679601012102
213 Block: 291679601012103
214 Block: 291679601012104
215 Block: 291679601023000
216 Block: 291679601023001
217 Block: 291679601023002
218 Block: 291679601023003

HB 2 88
219 Block: 291679601023009
220 Block: 291679601023010
221 Block: 291679601023011
222 Block: 291679601023012
223 Block: 291679601023013
224 Block: 291679601023014
225 Block: 291679601023015
226 Block: 291679601023016
227 Block: 291679601023017
228 Block: 291679601023018
229 Block: 291679601023019
230 Block: 291679601023020
231 Block: 291679601023022
232 Block: 291679601023023
233 Block: 291679601023025
234 Block: 291679601023026
235 Block: 291679601023027
236 Block: 291679601023028
237 Block: 291679601023029
238 Block: 291679601023031
239 Block: 291679601023032
240 Block: 291679601023033
241 Block: 291679601023037
242 Block: 291679601023040
243 Block: 291679601023042
244 Block: 291679601023043
245 Block: 291679601023044
246 Block: 291679601023045
247 Block: 291679601023066
248 Block: 291679601023069
249 Block: 291679601023072
250 Block: 291679602021055
251 Block: 291679602021059
252 Block: 291679602021060
253 Block: 291679602021066
254 VTD: South Benton
255 VTD: South Greene

HB 2 89
256 VTD: Union
257 Block: 291679604021032
258 Block: 291679604021041
259 Block: 291679604021042
260 Block: 291679604021044
261 Block: 291679604021045
262 Block: 291679604021046
263 Block: 291679604021047
264 Block: 291679604021048
265 Block: 291679604021049
266 Block: 291679604021050
267 Block: 291679604021051
268 Block: 291679604021052
269 Block: 291679604021053
270 Block: 291679604021054
271 Block: 291679604021055
272 Block: 291679604021056
273 Block: 291679604021057
274 Block: 291679604021058
275 Block: 291679604021059
276 Block: 291679604021060
277 Block: 291679604021063
278 Block: 291679604021064
279 Block: 291679604021065
280 Block: 291679604021066
281 Block: 291679604021067
282 Block: 291679604021068
283 Block: 291679604021069
284 Block: 291679604021070
285 Block: 291679604021071
286 Block: 291679604021072
287 Block: 291679604021073
288 Block: 291679604021074
289 Block: 291679604021075
290 Block: 291679604021081
291 Block: 291679604021082
292 Block: 291679604021085

HB 2 90
293 Block: 291679604021086
294 Block: 291679604021087
295 Block: 291679604021088
296 Block: 291679604021089
297 Block: 291679604021090
298 Block: 291679604021091
299 Block: 291679604021092
300 Block: 291679604021093
301 Block: 291679604021094
302 Block: 291679604021095
303 Block: 291679604021096
304 Block: 291679604021097
305 Block: 291679604021098
306 Block: 291679604021100
307 Block: 291679604021101
308 Block: 291679604021102
309 Block: 291679604021103
310 Block: 291679604021104
311 Block: 291679604021105
312 Block: 291679604021106
313 Block: 291679604021107
314 Block: 291679604021108
315 Block: 291679604021109
316 Block: 291679604021111
317 Block: 291679604021116
318 Block: 291679604021117
319 Block: 291679604023012
320 Block: 291679604024000
321 Block: 291679604024004
322 Block: 291679604024005
323 Block: 291679604024016
324 Block: 291679604024017
325 Block: 291679604024022
326 Block: 291679604024025
327 VTD: West Madison
328 County: Pulaski MO
329 County: Saline MO

HB 2 91
330 County: St. Clair MO
331 County: Texas MO
332 County: Vernon MO
333 County: Webster MO
334 County: Wright MO
128.475. The fifth congressional district shall be composed of the following:
2 County: Clay MO
3 VTD: Chou 8
4 VTD: Gal 10
5 VTD: Gal 11
6 VTD: Gal 12
7 VTD: Gal 13
8 VTD: Gal 14
9 VTD: Gal 15
10 VTD: Gal 16
11 VTD: Gal 17
12 VTD: Gal 18
13 VTD: Gal 4
14 VTD: Gal 5
15 VTD: Gal 6
16 VTD: Gal 7
17 VTD: Gal 9
18 VTD: KC 21 Lib 2
19 VTD: KC 21-1
20 VTD: KC 21-10
21 VTD: KC 21-11
22 VTD: KC 21-12
23 VTD: KC 21-14
24 VTD: KC 21-15
25 VTD: KC 21-16
26 Block: 290470212111000
27 Block: 290470212111001
28 Block: 290470212111002
29 Block: 290470212111003
30 Block: 290470212111004
31 Block: 290470212111005
32 Block: 290470212111006

HB 2 92
33 Block: 290470212111007
34 Block: 290470212111008
35 Block: 290470212111009
36 Block: 290470212111010
37 Block: 290470212111011
38 Block: 290470212111012
39 Block: 290470212111013
40 Block: 290470212111014
41 Block: 290470212111015
42 Block: 290470212111016
43 Block: 290470212111017
44 Block: 290470212111018
45 Block: 290470212111019
46 Block: 290470212111020
47 Block: 290470212112000
48 Block: 290470212112001
49 Block: 290470212112002
50 Block: 290470212112003
51 Block: 290470212112004
52 Block: 290470212112005
53 Block: 290470212112006
54 Block: 290470212112007
55 Block: 290470212112008
56 Block: 290470212112009
57 Block: 290470212112010
58 Block: 290470212112011
59 Block: 290470212112012
60 Block: 290470212112013
61 Block: 290470212112014
62 Block: 290470212112015
63 Block: 290470212112016
64 Block: 290470212112017
65 Block: 290470212112018
66 Block: 290470212131000
67 Block: 290470212131001
68 Block: 290470212131002
69 Block: 290470212131003

HB 2 93
70 Block: 290470212131004
71 Block: 290470212131005
72 Block: 290470212131006
73 Block: 290470212131007
74 Block: 290470212131008
75 Block: 290470212131009
76 Block: 290470212131010
77 Block: 290470212131011
78 Block: 290470212131012
79 Block: 290470212131013
80 Block: 290470212131014
81 Block: 290470212131015
82 Block: 290470212131016
83 Block: 290470212131017
84 Block: 290470212131018
85 Block: 290470212131019
86 Block: 290470212131020
87 Block: 290470212131021
88 Block: 290470212131022
89 Block: 290470212131023
90 Block: 290470212131024
91 Block: 290470212131025
92 Block: 290470212131026
93 Block: 290470212131027
94 Block: 290470212131028
95 Block: 290470212131029
96 Block: 290470212131030
97 Block: 290470212131031
98 Block: 290470212131032
99 Block: 290470212131033
100 Block: 290470212131034
101 Block: 290470212131035
102 Block: 290470212141029
103 VTD: KC 21-17
104 Block: 290470212141030
105 Block: 290470212141031
106 Block: 290470212141033

HB 2 94
107 Block: 290470212141034
108 Block: 290470212141035
109 Block: 290470212141036
110 Block: 290470212141037
111 Block: 290470212141038
112 Block: 290470212141039
113 VTD: KC 21-18
114 VTD: KC 21-19
115 VTD: KC 21-2
116 VTD: KC 21-20
117 VTD: KC 21-21
118 VTD: KC 21-22
119 VTD: KC 21-23
120 VTD: KC 21-24
121 VTD: KC 21-25
122 VTD: KC 21-3
123 VTD: KC 21-4
124 VTD: KC 21-5
125 VTD: KC 21-6
126 VTD: KC 21-7
127 VTD: KC 21-8
128 VTD: KC 21-9
129 VTD: Lib 13
130 Block: 290470222003003
131 Block: 290470222003042
132 Block: 290470222003067
133 Block: 290470223023012
134 Block: 290470223023014
135 Block: 290470223023022
136 VTD: Lib 5
137 Block: 290470208021011
138 Block: 290470208021012
139 Block: 290470208021043
140 Block: 290470208021044
141 Block: 290470208021045
142 Block: 290470208021046
143 Block: 290470208031000

HB 2 95
144 Block: 290470208031001
145 Block: 290470208031002
146 Block: 290470208031003
147 Block: 290470208031004
148 Block: 290470208031005
149 Block: 290470208031006
150 Block: 290470208031007
151 Block: 290470208031008
152 Block: 290470208031009
153 Block: 290470208031010
154 Block: 290470208031011
155 Block: 290470208031012
156 Block: 290470208031013
157 Block: 290470208031014
158 Block: 290470208031015
159 Block: 290470208031016
160 Block: 290470208031017
161 Block: 290470208032000
162 Block: 290470208032001
163 Block: 290470208032002
164 Block: 290470208032003
165 Block: 290470208032004
166 Block: 290470208033000
167 Block: 290470208033001
168 Block: 290470208033002
169 Block: 290470208033003
170 Block: 290470208033004
171 Block: 290470208033005
172 Block: 290470208033006
173 Block: 290470208033007
174 Block: 290470208033008
175 Block: 290470208033009
176 Block: 290470208033010
177 Block: 290470208033011
178 Block: 290470208033013
179 Block: 290470208033014
180 Block: 290470208033017

HB 2 96
181 Block: 290470209021004
182 Block: 290470209021005
183 Block: 290470209021006
184 Block: 290470209021007
185 Block: 290470223023010
186 Block: 290470223023011
187 Block: 290470223023018
188 VTD: Lib 6
189 Block: 290470208021009
190 Block: 290470208021010
191 Block: 290470208022021
192 Block: 290470208022022
193 VTD: Lib 8
194 Block: 290470216022169
195 Block: 290470216022170
196 County: Jackson MO
197 VTD: 1603
198 VTD: 412
199 VTD: 413
200 VTD: 414
201 VTD: 415
202 VTD: 616
203 VTD: 617
204 VTD: 618
205 VTD: 619
206 VTD: Blue 01-01
207 VTD: Blue 01-02
208 VTD: Blue 01-03
209 VTD: Blue 01-04
210 VTD: Blue 01-05
211 VTD: Blue 01-06
212 VTD: Blue 01-07
213 VTD: Blue 01-08
214 VTD: Blue 01-09
215 VTD: Blue 02-01
216 VTD: Blue 02-02
217 VTD: Blue 02-03

HB 2 97
218 VTD: Blue 02-04
219 VTD: Blue 02-05
220 VTD: Blue 02-06
221 VTD: Blue 02-07
222 VTD: Blue 03-01
223 Block: 290950147021000
224 Block: 290950147021001
225 Block: 290950147021018
226 Block: 290950147021019
227 Block: 290950177003009
228 Block: 290950177003010
229 Block: 290950177003011
230 Block: 290950177003023
231 Block: 290950177003024
232 Block: 290950177003025
233 Block: 290950177003026
234 Block: 290950177003027
235 Block: 290950177003028
236 Block: 290950177003029
237 Block: 290950177003030
238 Block: 290950177003031
239 VTD: Blue 03-02
240 VTD: Blue 03-03
241 VTD: Blue 03-04
242 VTD: Blue 03-05
243 VTD: Blue 03-06
244 VTD: Blue 03-07
245 Block: 290950151001000
246 Block: 290950151001001
247 Block: 290950151001006
248 Block: 290950151001007
249 Block: 290950151001017
250 Block: 290950151001018
251 Block: 290950151001019
252 Block: 290950151001048
253 Block: 290950151001054
254 VTD: Blue 03-08

HB 2 98
255 Block: 290950151001005
256 Block: 290950151001055
257 Block: 290950151001056
258 Block: 290950151001061
259 Block: 290950151001062
260 Block: 290950151001087
261 Block: 290950151001088
262 Block: 290950151001089
263 Block: 290950151001090
264 Block: 290950151002000
265 Block: 290950151002001
266 Block: 290950151002002
267 Block: 290950151002003
268 Block: 290950151002004
269 Block: 290950151002005
270 Block: 290950151002006
271 Block: 290950151002014
272 Block: 290950151002015
273 Block: 290950151002016
274 Block: 290950151002025
275 Block: 290950151002026
276 Block: 290950151002027
277 Block: 290950151002028
278 Block: 290950151002030
279 Block: 290950151002031
280 Block: 290950151003000
281 Block: 290950151003001
282 Block: 290950151003003
283 Block: 290950151003004
284 Block: 290950151003005
285 Block: 290950151003011
286 Block: 290950151003012
287 Block: 290950151003013
288 Block: 290950151003014
289 Block: 290950151003015
290 Block: 290950151003016
291 Block: 290950151003018

HB 2 99
292 Block: 290950151003019
293 Block: 290950151003020
294 Block: 290950151003021
295 Block: 290950151003022
296 VTD: Blue 03-09
297 Block: 290950150001060
298 VTD: Blue 04-01
299 VTD: Blue 04-02
300 VTD: Blue 04-03
301 VTD: Blue 04-04
302 VTD: Blue 04-05
303 VTD: Blue 04-06
304 VTD: Blue 04-07
305 VTD: Blue 04-08
306 VTD: Blue 04-09
307 VTD: Blue 04-10
308 VTD: Blue 05-01
309 VTD: Blue 05-02
310 VTD: Blue 05-03
311 VTD: Blue 05-04
312 VTD: Blue 05-05
313 VTD: Blue 05-06
314 VTD: Blue 05-07
315 VTD: Blue 05-08
316 VTD: Blue 05-09
317 VTD: Blue 06-01
318 VTD: Blue 06-02
319 VTD: Blue 06-03
320 VTD: Blue 06-04
321 VTD: Blue 06-05
322 VTD: Blue 06-06
323 Block: 290950147021011
324 Block: 290950147021012
325 Block: 290950147021020
326 Block: 290950147021021
327 Block: 290950147021022
328 Block: 290950147021029

HB 2 100
329 Block: 290950147021030
330 Block: 290950147021031
331 Block: 290950147021032
332 Block: 290950147021033
333 Block: 290950147021034
334 Block: 290950147021035
335 Block: 290950147021037
336 Block: 290950147021040
337 Block: 290950147022000
338 Block: 290950147023000
339 Block: 290950147023001
340 Block: 290950147023002
341 Block: 290950147023003
342 Block: 290950147023004
343 Block: 290950147023005
344 Block: 290950147023006
345 Block: 290950147023007
346 Block: 290950147023009
347 VTD: Blue 06-07
348 Block: 290950114072000
349 Block: 290950114072001
350 Block: 290950114072002
351 Block: 290950114072003
352 Block: 290950114072004
353 Block: 290950114072005
354 Block: 290950114072014
355 Block: 290950114072015
356 Block: 290950114072016
357 Block: 290950147021002
358 Block: 290950147021003
359 Block: 290950147021008
360 Block: 290950147021009
361 Block: 290950147021010
362 Block: 290950147021015
363 Block: 290950147021016
364 Block: 290950147021017
365 VTD: Blue 07-01

HB 2 101
366 VTD: Blue 07-02
367 VTD: Blue 07-03
368 VTD: Blue 07-04
369 VTD: Blue 07-05
370 VTD: Blue 07-06
371 VTD: Blue 07-07
372 VTD: Blue 07-08
373 VTD: Blue 07-09
374 VTD: Blue 08-01
375 VTD: Blue 08-02
376 Block: 290950147011000
377 Block: 290950147011001
378 Block: 290950147011002
379 Block: 290950147011003
380 Block: 290950147011004
381 Block: 290950147011005
382 Block: 290950147011006
383 Block: 290950147011007
384 Block: 290950147011008
385 Block: 290950147011009
386 Block: 290950147011010
387 Block: 290950147011011
388 Block: 290950147011012
389 Block: 290950147011013
390 Block: 290950147011017
391 Block: 290950147011018
392 Block: 290950147011019
393 Block: 290950147013001
394 Block: 290950147013015
395 Block: 290950147021038
396 Block: 290950147021039
397 Block: 290950147021041
398 Block: 290950147023012
399 Block: 290950147023013
400 Block: 290950147023014
401 Block: 290950147023015
402 Block: 290950147023016

HB 2 102
403 Block: 290950147023017
404 Block: 290950147023020
405 Block: 290950147023021
406 Block: 290950147023025
407 Block: 290950147023026
408 Block: 290950147023027
409 VTD: Blue 08-03
410 VTD: Blue 08-04
411 VTD: Blue 08-05
412 Block: 290950146032000
413 Block: 290950146032001
414 Block: 290950146032002
415 Block: 290950146032003
416 Block: 290950146032004
417 Block: 290950146032005
418 Block: 290950146032006
419 Block: 290950146032007
420 Block: 290950146032008
421 Block: 290950146032009
422 Block: 290950146032010
423 Block: 290950146032011
424 Block: 290950146032012
425 Block: 290950146032013
426 Block: 290950146043013
427 Block: 290950146043014
428 Block: 290950146043015
429 Block: 290950146043016
430 Block: 290950146043017
431 Block: 290950146043018
432 Block: 290950146043019
433 Block: 290950147011014
434 Block: 290950147011015
435 Block: 290950147011016
436 Block: 290950147012002
437 Block: 290950147012003
438 Block: 290950147012004
439 Block: 290950147012005

HB 2 103
440 Block: 290950147012006
441 Block: 290950147012007
442 Block: 290950147012008
443 Block: 290950147012009
444 Block: 290950147012010
445 Block: 290950147013010
446 Block: 290950147013011
447 Block: 290950147013012
448 Block: 290950147013013
449 Block: 290950147013014
450 Block: 290950147013016
451 Block: 290950147013017
452 Block: 290950147013018
453 Block: 290950147013019
454 Block: 290950147013020
455 Block: 290950147013021
456 Block: 290950147013022
457 Block: 290950147013023
458 VTD: Blue 08-06
459 VTD: Blue 08-07
460 VTD: Blue 08-08
461 VTD: Brooking No. 1
462 VTD: Brooking No. 10
463 VTD: Brooking No. 11
464 VTD: Brooking No. 12
465 VTD: Brooking No. 13
466 VTD: Brooking No. 14
467 VTD: Brooking No. 15
468 VTD: Brooking No. 16
469 VTD: Brooking No. 17
470 VTD: Brooking No. 18
471 VTD: Brooking No. 19
472 VTD: Brooking No. 2
473 VTD: Brooking No. 20
474 VTD: Brooking No. 3
475 VTD: Brooking No. 4
476 VTD: Brooking No. 5

HB 2 104
477 VTD: Brooking No. 6
478 VTD: Brooking No. 7
479 VTD: Brooking No. 8
480 VTD: Brooking No. 9
481 VTD: Fort Osage 01
482 Block: 290950177001027
483 Block: 290950177001028
484 Block: 290950177001029
485 Block: 290950177001030
486 Block: 290950177001031
487 Block: 290950177001032
488 Block: 290950177001033
489 Block: 290950177001034
490 VTD: Fort Osage 02
491 Block: 290950177001015
492 Block: 290950177001016
493 Block: 290950177001022
494 Block: 290950177001023
495 Block: 290950177001026
496 VTD: KC 1001
497 VTD: KC 1002
498 VTD: KC 1003
499 VTD: KC 1004
500 VTD: KC 1005
501 VTD: KC 1006
502 VTD: KC 1007
503 VTD: KC 1008
504 VTD: KC 1009
505 VTD: KC 101
506 VTD: KC 1010
507 VTD: KC 1011
508 VTD: KC 1012
509 VTD: KC 102
510 VTD: KC 103
511 VTD: KC 104
512 VTD: KC 105
513 VTD: KC 106

HB 2 105
514 VTD: KC 107
515 VTD: KC 1101
516 VTD: KC 1102
517 VTD: KC 1103
518 VTD: KC 1104
519 VTD: KC 1105
520 VTD: KC 1106
521 VTD: KC 1107
522 VTD: KC 1108
523 VTD: KC 1109
524 VTD: KC 1110
525 VTD: KC 1111
526 VTD: KC 1112
527 VTD: KC 1113
528 VTD: KC 1114
529 VTD: KC 1201
530 VTD: KC 1202
531 VTD: KC 1203
532 VTD: KC 1204
533 VTD: KC 1205
534 VTD: KC 1206
535 VTD: KC 1207
536 VTD: KC 1208
537 VTD: KC 1209
538 VTD: KC 1210
539 VTD: KC 1211
540 VTD: KC 1212
541 VTD: KC 1301
542 VTD: KC 1303
543 VTD: KC 1304
544 VTD: KC 1305
545 VTD: KC 1306
546 VTD: KC 1307
547 VTD: KC 1308
548 VTD: KC 1309
549 VTD: KC 1310
550 VTD: KC 1311

HB 2 106
551 VTD: KC 1312
552 VTD: KC 1313
553 VTD: KC 1401
554 VTD: KC 1402
555 VTD: KC 1403
556 VTD: KC 1404
557 VTD: KC 1405
558 VTD: KC 1406
559 VTD: KC 1407
560 VTD: KC 1408
561 VTD: KC 1409
562 VTD: KC 1410
563 VTD: KC 1411
564 VTD: KC 1412
565 VTD: KC 1413
566 VTD: KC 1414
567 VTD: KC 1415
568 VTD: KC 1501
569 VTD: KC 1502
570 VTD: KC 1503
571 VTD: KC 1504
572 VTD: KC 1505
573 VTD: KC 1506
574 VTD: KC 1507
575 VTD: KC 1508
576 VTD: KC 1509
577 VTD: KC 1510
578 VTD: KC 1511
579 VTD: KC 1512
580 VTD: KC 1513
581 VTD: KC 1514
582 VTD: KC 1515
583 VTD: KC 1516
584 VTD: KC 1517
585 VTD: KC 1518
586 VTD: KC 1519
587 VTD: KC 1520

HB 2 107
588 VTD: KC 1521
589 VTD: KC 1522
590 VTD: KC 1523
591 VTD: KC 1524
592 VTD: KC 1601
593 VTD: KC 1602
594 VTD: KC 1604
595 VTD: KC 1605
596 VTD: KC 1606
597 VTD: KC 1607
598 VTD: KC 1608
599 VTD: KC 1609
600 VTD: KC 1610
601 VTD: KC 1611
602 VTD: KC 1612
603 VTD: KC 1613
604 VTD: KC 1614
605 VTD: KC 1615
606 VTD: KC 1701
607 VTD: KC 1702
608 VTD: KC 1703
609 VTD: KC 1704
610 VTD: KC 1705
611 VTD: KC 1706
612 VTD: KC 1707
613 VTD: KC 1708
614 VTD: KC 1709
615 VTD: KC 1710
616 VTD: KC 1711
617 VTD: KC 1712
618 VTD: KC 1713
619 VTD: KC 1714
620 VTD: KC 1801
621 VTD: KC 1802
622 VTD: KC 1803
623 VTD: KC 1804
624 VTD: KC 1805

HB 2 108
625 VTD: KC 1806
626 VTD: KC 1807
627 VTD: KC 1808
628 VTD: KC 1809
629 VTD: KC 1810
630 VTD: KC 1811
631 VTD: KC 1812
632 VTD: KC 1813
633 VTD: KC 1814
634 VTD: KC 1815
635 VTD: KC 1816
636 VTD: KC 1901
637 VTD: KC 1902
638 VTD: KC 1903
639 VTD: KC 1904
640 VTD: KC 1905
641 VTD: KC 1906
642 VTD: KC 1907
643 VTD: KC 1908
644 VTD: KC 1909
645 VTD: KC 1910
646 VTD: KC 1911
647 VTD: KC 1912
648 VTD: KC 1913
649 VTD: KC 1914
650 VTD: KC 1915
651 VTD: KC 1916
652 VTD: KC 1917
653 VTD: KC 1918
654 VTD: KC 1919
655 VTD: KC 1920
656 VTD: KC 1921
657 VTD: KC 1922
658 VTD: KC 1923
659 VTD: KC 2001
660 VTD: KC 2002
661 VTD: KC 2003

HB 2 109
662 VTD: KC 2004
663 VTD: KC 2005
664 VTD: KC 2006
665 VTD: KC 2007
666 VTD: KC 2008
667 VTD: KC 2009
668 VTD: KC 201
669 VTD: KC 2010
670 VTD: KC 202
671 VTD: KC 203
672 VTD: KC 204
673 VTD: KC 207
674 VTD: KC 208
675 VTD: KC 209
676 VTD: KC 210
677 VTD: KC 212
678 VTD: KC 213
679 VTD: KC 214
680 VTD: KC 215
681 VTD: KC 216
682 VTD: KC 217
683 VTD: KC 218
684 VTD: KC 2201
685 VTD: KC 2202
686 VTD: KC 2203
687 VTD: KC 2204
688 VTD: KC 2205
689 VTD: KC 2206
690 VTD: KC 2207
691 VTD: KC 2208
692 VTD: KC 2209
693 VTD: KC 2210
694 VTD: KC 2211
695 VTD: KC 2212
696 VTD: KC 2213
697 VTD: KC 2301
698 VTD: KC 2302

HB 2 110
699 VTD: KC 2303
700 VTD: KC 2304
701 VTD: KC 2305
702 VTD: KC 2306
703 VTD: KC 2307
704 VTD: KC 2308
705 VTD: KC 2309
706 VTD: KC 2310
707 VTD: KC 2311
708 VTD: KC 2312
709 VTD: KC 2313
710 VTD: KC 2314
711 VTD: KC 2315
712 VTD: KC 2316
713 VTD: KC 2401
714 VTD: KC 2402
715 VTD: KC 2403
716 VTD: KC 2404
717 VTD: KC 2405
718 VTD: KC 2406
719 VTD: KC 2407
720 VTD: KC 2408
721 VTD: KC 2409
722 VTD: KC 2410
723 VTD: KC 2411
724 VTD: KC 2412
725 VTD: KC 2413
726 VTD: KC 2414
727 VTD: KC 2415
728 VTD: KC 2416
729 VTD: KC 2417
730 VTD: KC 2418
731 VTD: KC 2419
732 VTD: KC 2420
733 VTD: KC 2421
734 VTD: KC 2422
735 VTD: KC 2423

HB 2 111
736 VTD: KC 2424
737 VTD: KC 2425
738 VTD: KC 2426
739 VTD: KC 2427
740 VTD: KC 2428
741 VTD: KC 2429
742 VTD: KC 2430
743 VTD: KC 2431
744 VTD: KC 2501
745 VTD: KC 2502
746 VTD: KC 2503
747 VTD: KC 2504
748 VTD: KC 2505
749 VTD: KC 2506
750 VTD: KC 2507
751 VTD: KC 2508
752 VTD: KC 2509
753 VTD: KC 2510
754 VTD: KC 2511
755 VTD: KC 2512
756 VTD: KC 2513
757 VTD: KC 2514
758 VTD: KC 2601
759 VTD: KC 2602
760 VTD: KC 2603
761 VTD: KC 2604
762 VTD: KC 2605
763 VTD: KC 2606
764 VTD: KC 2607
765 VTD: KC 2608
766 VTD: KC 2609
767 VTD: KC 2610
768 VTD: KC 2611
769 VTD: KC 2612
770 VTD: KC 2613
771 VTD: KC 301
772 VTD: KC 302

HB 2 112
773 VTD: KC 303
774 VTD: KC 304
775 VTD: KC 305
776 VTD: KC 306
777 VTD: KC 307
778 VTD: KC 308
779 VTD: KC 309
780 VTD: KC 310
781 VTD: KC 311
782 VTD: KC 312
783 VTD: KC 313
784 VTD: KC 314
785 VTD: KC 315
786 VTD: KC 316
787 VTD: KC 317
788 VTD: KC 318
789 VTD: KC 401
790 VTD: KC 402
791 VTD: KC 403
792 VTD: KC 404
793 VTD: KC 405
794 VTD: KC 406
795 VTD: KC 407
796 VTD: KC 408
797 VTD: KC 409
798 VTD: KC 410
799 VTD: KC 411
800 VTD: KC 501
801 VTD: KC 502
802 VTD: KC 503
803 VTD: KC 504
804 VTD: KC 505
805 VTD: KC 506
806 VTD: KC 507
807 VTD: KC 508
808 VTD: KC 509
809 VTD: KC 510

HB 2 113
810 VTD: KC 511
811 VTD: KC 512
812 VTD: KC 513
813 VTD: KC 601
814 VTD: KC 602
815 VTD: KC 603
816 VTD: KC 604
817 VTD: KC 605
818 VTD: KC 606
819 VTD: KC 607
820 VTD: KC 608
821 VTD: KC 609
822 VTD: KC 610
823 VTD: KC 611
824 VTD: KC 612
825 VTD: KC 613
826 VTD: KC 614
827 VTD: KC 615
828 VTD: KC 701
829 VTD: KC 702
830 VTD: KC 703
831 VTD: KC 704
832 VTD: KC 705
833 VTD: KC 706
834 VTD: KC 707
835 VTD: KC 708
836 VTD: KC 709
837 VTD: KC 710
838 VTD: KC 711
839 VTD: KC 712
840 VTD: KC 713
841 VTD: KC 714
842 VTD: KC 715
843 VTD: KC 716
844 VTD: KC 717
845 VTD: KC 718
846 VTD: KC 801

HB 2 114
847 VTD: KC 802
848 VTD: KC 803
849 VTD: KC 804
850 VTD: KC 805
851 VTD: KC 806
852 VTD: KC 807
853 VTD: KC 808
854 VTD: KC 809
855 VTD: KC 811
856 VTD: KC 812
857 VTD: KC 813
858 VTD: KC 814
859 VTD: KC 815
860 VTD: KC 901
861 VTD: KC 902
862 VTD: KC 903
863 VTD: KC 904
864 VTD: KC 905
865 VTD: KC 906
866 VTD: KC 907
867 VTD: KC 908
868 VTD: KC 909
869 VTD: KC 910
870 VTD: KC 911
871 VTD: KC 913
872 VTD: KC WD13 PCT1302
873 VTD: KC WD2 PCT205
874 VTD: KC WD2 PCT206
875 VTD: KC WD2 PCT211
876 VTD: KC WD8 PCT810
877 VTD: KC1314
878 VTD: Prairie 03
879 Block: 290950137061011
880 Block: 290950137061012
881 Block: 290950137061017
882 Block: 290950137061018
883 Block: 290950137061019

HB 2 115
884 Block: 290950137061020
885 Block: 290950137061029
886 Block: 290950137061030
887 Block: 290950137061031
888 Block: 290950137061032
889 Block: 290950137061033
890 Block: 290950137061034
891 Block: 290950137061035
892 Block: 290950137061036
893 Block: 290950137061037
894 Block: 290950137061038
895 Block: 290950137061039
896 Block: 290950137061056
897 Block: 290950137063005
898 Block: 290950137063008
899 Block: 290950137063009
900 Block: 290950137063010
901 Block: 290950137063011
902 Block: 290950137063012
903 Block: 290950137063013
904 Block: 290950137063014
905 Block: 290950137063015
906 Block: 290950137063016
907 Block: 290950137063017
908 Block: 290950137063018
909 VTD: Prairie 04
910 Block: 290950137051001
911 Block: 290950137051002
912 Block: 290950137051003
913 Block: 290950137051004
914 Block: 290950137051005
915 Block: 290950137051006
916 Block: 290950137051007
917 Block: 290950137051008
918 Block: 290950137051009
919 Block: 290950137051010
920 Block: 290950137051011

HB 2 116
921 Block: 290950137051012
922 Block: 290950137051013
923 Block: 290950137051014
924 Block: 290950137051015
925 Block: 290950137051016
926 Block: 290950137051019
927 Block: 290950137051020
928 Block: 290950137051021
929 Block: 290950137051022
930 Block: 290950137051023
931 Block: 290950137051024
932 Block: 290950137051025
933 Block: 290950137051026
934 Block: 290950137051027
935 Block: 290950137051028
936 Block: 290950137051029
937 Block: 290950137051030
938 Block: 290950137051031
939 Block: 290950137051032
940 Block: 290950137051033
941 Block: 290950137051034
942 Block: 290950137051035
943 Block: 290950137051036
944 Block: 290950137061051
945 Block: 290950137061052
946 Block: 290950137061053
947 Block: 290950137061057
948 Block: 290950137061058
949 Block: 290950137061059
950 Block: 290950137061060
951 Block: 290950137061061
952 Block: 290950137061062
953 Block: 290950137061063
954 Block: 290950137061064
955 Block: 290950137061065
956 Block: 290950137061066
957 Block: 290950137061067

HB 2 117
958 Block: 290950137061068
959 Block: 290950137061069
960 Block: 290950137061070
961 Block: 290950137061071
962 Block: 290950180003006
963 Block: 290950180003007
964 Block: 290950180003008
965 Block: 290950180003009
966 Block: 290950180003010
967 Block: 290950180003011
968 Block: 290950180003014
969 Block: 290950180003015
970 Block: 290950180003016
971 Block: 290950180003017
972 Block: 290950180003018
973 Block: 290950180003022
974 Block: 290950180003023
975 Block: 290950180003024
976 Block: 290950180003025
977 Block: 290950180003026
978 Block: 290950180003027
979 Block: 290950180003028
980 Block: 290950180003029
981 Block: 290950180003030
982 Block: 290950180003031
983 Block: 290950180003032
984 Block: 290950180003033
985 Block: 290950180003034
986 Block: 290950180003035
987 Block: 290950180003036
988 VTD: Prairie 07
989 VTD: Prairie 08
990 VTD: Prairie 09
991 VTD: Prairie 11
992 VTD: Prairie 12
993 VTD: Prairie 13
994 VTD: Prairie 14

HB 2 118
995 VTD: Prairie 15
996 VTD: Prairie 16
997 VTD: Prairie 17
998 VTD: Prairie 18
999 VTD: Prairie 19
1000 VTD: Prairie 20
1001 VTD: Prairie 21
1002 VTD: Prairie 22
1003 VTD: Prairie 23
1004 VTD: Prairie 24
1005 VTD: Prairie 26
1006 VTD: Prairie 27
1007 Block: 290950142031001
1008 Block: 290950142031002
1009 Block: 290950142031003
1010 Block: 290950142031015
1011 Block: 290950142031016
1012 Block: 290950142031017
1013 Block: 290950142031019
1014 Block: 290950142031020
1015 Block: 290950142031021
1016 Block: 290950142032000
1017 Block: 290950142032001
1018 Block: 290950142032002
1019 Block: 290950142032003
1020 Block: 290950142032004
1021 Block: 290950142032005
1022 Block: 290950142032006
1023 Block: 290950142033001
1024 Block: 290950142033002
1025 Block: 290950142033003
1026 Block: 290950142033004
1027 Block: 290950142033005
1028 Block: 290950142033006
1029 Block: 290950142033007
1030 Block: 290950185003004
1031 VTD: Prairie 28

HB 2 119
1032 VTD: Prairie 29
1033 Block: 290950185003000
1034 Block: 290950185003001
1035 Block: 290950185003002
1036 Block: 290950185003003
1037 VTD: Prairie 30
1038 VTD: Prairie 31
1039 VTD: Prairie 33
1040 VTD: Prairie 34
1041 VTD: Prairie 35
1042 VTD: Prairie 36
1043 VTD: Prairie 40
1044 Block: 290950137051017
1045 VTD: Prairie 48
1046 VTD: Prairie 49
1047 VTD: Prairie 50
1048 VTD: Prairie 52
1049 Block: 290950139181005
1050 Block: 290950139181007
1051 Block: 290950139181008
1052 Block: 290950139181009
1053 Block: 290950139181010
1054 Block: 290950139181011
1055 Block: 290950139181016
1056 Block: 290950141111015
1057 Block: 290950141111016
1058 Block: 290950141111017
1059 Block: 290950141111019
1060 Block: 290950141111020
1061 Block: 290950141111021
1062 Block: 290950141111022
1063 Block: 290950141111023
1064 Block: 290950141111024
1065 Block: 290950141111025
1066 Block: 290950141111026
1067 Block: 290950141111027
1068 Block: 290950141111028

HB 2 120
1069 Block: 290950141111029
1070 Block: 290950141111033
1071 Block: 290950141111036
1072 Block: 290950141111037
1073 Block: 290950141121020
1074 Block: 290950141121021
1075 Block: 290950141121022
1076 Block: 290950141121023
1077 Block: 290950141121024
1078 Block: 290950141121025
1079 Block: 290950141121026
1080 Block: 290950141121027
1081 Block: 290950141121028
1082 Block: 290950141121030
1083 Block: 290950141121031
1084 Block: 290950141121032
1085 Block: 290950141121033
1086 Block: 290950141121034
1087 Block: 290950141121044
1088 Block: 290950141121045
1089 Block: 290950141121046
1090 Block: 290950141121047
1091 Block: 290950141121048
1092 Block: 290950141121049
1093 Block: 290950141121050
1094 Block: 290950141121051
1095 Block: 290950141121052
1096 Block: 290950141121053
1097 Block: 290950141121054
1098 Block: 290950141121061
1099 VTD: Prairie 56
1100 VTD: Prairie 59
1101 Block: 290950139182031
1102 Block: 290950139183027
1103 VTD: Prairie 60
1104 VTD: Prairie 62
1105 VTD: Prarie 02

HB 2 121
1106 VTD: Prarie 10
1107 VTD: Prarie 25
1108 VTD: Prarie 54
1109 Block: 290950139181022
1110 VTD: Prarie 57
1111 VTD: Prarie 58
1112 VTD: Prarie 61
1113 VTD: Prarie 63
1114 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 01
1115 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 05
1116 Block: 290950148041033
1117 Block: 290950148041034
1118 Block: 290950148041036
1119 Block: 290950148041041
1120 Block: 290950148041045
1121 Block: 290950149033005
1122 Block: 290950149033007
1123 Block: 290950149033008
1124 Block: 290950149033009
1125 Block: 290950149033010
1126 Block: 290950149033012
1127 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 06
1128 Block: 290950149033002
1129 Block: 290950149033003
1130 Block: 290950149033004
1131 Block: 290950149033006
1132 Block: 290950149033011
1133 Block: 290950149033013
1134 Block: 290950149033014
1135 Block: 290950149033015
1136 Block: 290950149033016
1137 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 07
1138 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 09
1139 Block: 290950148061002
1140 Block: 290950148061003
1141 Block: 290950148061004
1142 Block: 290950148061005

HB 2 122
1143 Block: 290950148061006
1144 Block: 290950148061007
1145 Block: 290950148061008
1146 Block: 290950148061009
1147 Block: 290950148061019
1148 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 10
1149 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 11
1150 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 12
1151 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 13
1152 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 14
1153 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 15
1154 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 16
1155 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 20
1156 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 21
1157 Block: 290950141231000
1158 Block: 290950141231001
1159 Block: 290950141231002
1160 Block: 290950141231003
1161 Block: 290950141231004
1162 Block: 290950141231005
1163 Block: 290950141231008
1164 Block: 290950141231009
1165 Block: 290950141241000
1166 Block: 290950141241001
1167 Block: 290950141241002
1168 Block: 290950141241003
1169 Block: 290950141241004
1170 Block: 290950141241005
1171 Block: 290950141241006
1172 Block: 290950141241008
1173 Block: 290950141241009
1174 Block: 290950141241010
1175 Block: 290950141241011
1176 Block: 290950141241012
1177 Block: 290950141241013
1178 Block: 290950141241014
1179 Block: 290950141241015

HB 2 123
1180 Block: 290950141241026
1181 Block: 290950141272000
1182 Block: 290950141272001
1183 Block: 290950141272002
1184 Block: 290950141272003
1185 Block: 290950141272004
1186 Block: 290950141272005
1187 Block: 290950141272006
1188 Block: 290950141272007
1189 Block: 290950141272008
1190 Block: 290950141272009
1191 Block: 290950141272010
1192 Block: 290950141272023
1193 Block: 290950141272024
1194 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 22
1195 Block: 290950141241007
1196 Block: 290950141241016
1197 Block: 290950141241017
1198 Block: 290950141241018
1199 Block: 290950141241019
1200 Block: 290950141241020
1201 Block: 290950141241021
1202 Block: 290950141241022
1203 Block: 290950141241023
1204 Block: 290950141241024
1205 Block: 290950141241025
1206 Block: 290950141241027
1207 Block: 290950141241028
1208 Block: 290950141241029
1209 Block: 290950141241030
1210 Block: 290950141242000
1211 Block: 290950141242001
1212 Block: 290950141242002
1213 Block: 290950141242003
1214 Block: 290950141242004
1215 Block: 290950141242005
1216 Block: 290950141243000

HB 2 124
1217 Block: 290950141243001
1218 Block: 290950141243002
1219 Block: 290950141243003
1220 Block: 290950141243004
1221 Block: 290950141243005
1222 Block: 290950141243006
1223 Block: 290950141243007
1224 Block: 290950141243008
1225 Block: 290950141243009
1226 Block: 290950141243010
1227 Block: 290950141243011
1228 Block: 290950141243012
1229 Block: 290950141243013
1230 Block: 290950141243014
1231 Block: 290950141243015
1232 Block: 290950141243016
1233 Block: 290950141243017
1234 Block: 290950141243018
1235 Block: 290950141243019
1236 Block: 290950141243020
1237 Block: 290950141243021
1238 Block: 290950141243022
1239 Block: 290950141243023
1240 Block: 290950141243024
1241 Block: 290950141272011
1242 Block: 290950141272012
1243 Block: 290950141272013
1244 Block: 290950141272014
1245 Block: 290950141272015
1246 Block: 290950141272016
1247 Block: 290950141272017
1248 Block: 290950141272018
1249 Block: 290950141272019
1250 Block: 290950141272020
1251 Block: 290950141272021
1252 Block: 290950141272022
1253 Block: 290950141272025

HB 2 125
1254 Block: 290950141272026
1255 Block: 290950141272027
1256 Block: 290950141272028
1257 Block: 290950141272029
1258 Block: 290950141272030
1259 Block: 290950141272031
1260 Block: 290950141272032
1261 Block: 290950141272033
1262 Block: 290950141272034
1263 Block: 290950141272035
1264 Block: 290950141272036
1265 Block: 290950141272037
1266 Block: 290950141272038
1267 Block: 290950141272039
1268 Block: 290950141272040
1269 Block: 290950141272041
1270 Block: 290950141272042
1271 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 23
1272 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 29
1273 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 30
1274 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 31
1275 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 32
1276 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 33
1277 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 37
1278 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 38
1279 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 39
1280 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 40
1281 Block: 290950140021000
1282 Block: 290950140021001
1283 Block: 290950140021002
1284 Block: 290950140041002
1285 Block: 290950140082000
1286 Block: 290950140092000
1287 Block: 290950140092001
1288 Block: 290950140092011
1289 Block: 290950140092018
1290 Block: 290950140092019

HB 2 126
1291 Block: 290950149032035
1292 Block: 290950149032039
1293 Block: 290950149032040
1294 Block: 290950149032049
1295 Block: 290950149032050
1296 Block: 290950149032051
1297 Block: 290950149032052
1298 Block: 290950149032053
1299 Block: 290950149032054
1300 Block: 290950149033017
1301 Block: 290950149033018
1302 Block: 290950149033019
1303 Block: 290950149033041
1304 Block: 290950149052001
1305 Block: 290950149052002
1306 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 41
1307 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 42
1308 Block: 290950140091000
1309 Block: 290950140091001
1310 Block: 290950140091002
1311 Block: 290950140091003
1312 Block: 290950140091004
1313 Block: 290950140091005
1314 Block: 290950140091006
1315 Block: 290950140091007
1316 Block: 290950140091008
1317 Block: 290950140091009
1318 Block: 290950140091010
1319 Block: 290950140091011
1320 Block: 290950140091013
1321 Block: 290950140091014
1322 Block: 290950140091015
1323 Block: 290950140091016
1324 Block: 290950140091017
1325 Block: 290950140092002
1326 Block: 290950140092003
1327 Block: 290950140092004

HB 2 127
1328 Block: 290950140092005
1329 Block: 290950140092006
1330 Block: 290950140092007
1331 Block: 290950140092008
1332 Block: 290950140092009
1333 Block: 290950140092010
1334 Block: 290950140092012
1335 Block: 290950140092013
1336 Block: 290950140092014
1337 Block: 290950140092015
1338 Block: 290950140092016
1339 Block: 290950140092017
1340 Block: 290950149052027
1341 Block: 290950149052028
1342 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 44
1343 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 45
1344 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 47
1345 Block: 290950140042000
1346 Block: 290950140042001
1347 Block: 290950140042002
1348 Block: 290950140042003
1349 Block: 290950140042004
1350 Block: 290950140042005
1351 Block: 290950140042006
1352 Block: 290950140042007
1353 Block: 290950140042008
1354 Block: 290950140042009
1355 Block: 290950140042010
1356 Block: 290950140042012
1357 Block: 290950140042018
1358 Block: 290950140052000
1359 Block: 290950140052001
1360 Block: 290950140052007
1361 Block: 290950140052008
1362 Block: 290950140052009
1363 Block: 290950140052010
1364 Block: 290950140052011

HB 2 128
1365 Block: 290950140052012
1366 Block: 290950140053000
1367 Block: 290950140053001
1368 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 48
1369 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 49
1370 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 52
1371 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 83
1372 VTD: Van Buren 01
1373 VTD: Van Buren 02
1374 VTD: Van Buren 03
1375 VTD: Van Buren 07
1376 Block: 290950139183020
1377 Block: 290950139183021
1378 Block: 290950139183023
1379 Block: 290950139183028
1380 Block: 290950139183029
1381 Block: 290950139183032
1382 VTD: Van Buren 08
1383 VTD: Van Buren 09
1384 VTD: Van Buren 10
1385 VTD: Van Buren 11
1386 VTD: Van Buren 12
1387 VTD: Van Buren 13
1388 VTD: Van Buren 14
1389 VTD: Van Buren 15
1390 VTD: Van Buren 16
1391 VTD: Van Buren 17
1392 VTD: Van Buren 18
1393 VTD: Van Buren 19
1394 VTD: Washington 01
1395 VTD: Washington 02
1396 VTD: Washington 03
1397 VTD: Washington 04
1398 VTD: Washington 05
1399 VTD: Washington 06
1400 VTD: Washington 07
1401 VTD: Washington 08

HB 2 129
1402 VTD: Washington 09
1403 VTD: Washington 10
1404 VTD: Washington 11
1405 VTD: Washington 12
128.476. The sixth congressional district shall be composed of the following:
2 County: Adair MO
3 County: Andrew MO
4 County: Atchison MO
5 County: Buchanan MO
6 County: Caldwell MO
7 County: Carroll MO
8 County: Chariton MO
9 County: Clark MO
10 County: Clay MO
11 VTD: FR 1
12 VTD: FR 2
13 VTD: FR 3
14 VTD: FR 4
15 VTD: FR 5
16 VTD: KC 21 Lib 1
17 VTD: KC 21 Lib 3
18 VTD: KC 21 Lib 4
19 VTD: KC 21 Lib 5
20 VTD: KC 21 Lib 6
21 VTD: KC 21 Pl 1
22 VTD: KC 21-13
23 VTD: KC 21-16
24 Block: 290470212122000
25 Block: 290470212122015
26 Block: 290470212122017
27 Block: 290470212122018
28 Block: 290470212122022
29 Block: 290470212123010
30 Block: 290470212123011
31 Block: 290470212123012
32 Block: 290470212123013
33 Block: 290470212123014

HB 2 130
34 Block: 290470212123018
35 Block: 290470212132016
36 VTD: KC 21-17
37 Block: 290470212141000
38 Block: 290470212141001
39 Block: 290470212141002
40 Block: 290470212141003
41 Block: 290470212141004
42 Block: 290470212141005
43 Block: 290470212141006
44 Block: 290470212141007
45 Block: 290470212141008
46 Block: 290470212141009
47 Block: 290470212141011
48 Block: 290470212141012
49 Block: 290470212141013
50 Block: 290470212141014
51 Block: 290470212141015
52 Block: 290470212141016
53 Block: 290470212141017
54 Block: 290470212141018
55 Block: 290470212141019
56 Block: 290470212141020
57 Block: 290470212141021
58 Block: 290470212141022
59 Block: 290470212141023
60 Block: 290470212141024
61 Block: 290470212141025
62 Block: 290470212141026
63 Block: 290470212141027
64 Block: 290470212141028
65 Block: 290470212141032
66 Block: 290470213131000
67 Block: 290470213131001
68 Block: 290470213131002
69 Block: 290470213131003
70 Block: 290470213131004

HB 2 131
71 Block: 290470213131005
72 Block: 290470213131006
73 Block: 290470213131007
74 Block: 290470213131008
75 Block: 290470213131009
76 Block: 290470213131010
77 Block: 290470213131011
78 Block: 290470213131012
79 Block: 290470213131013
80 Block: 290470213131014
81 Block: 290470213131015
82 Block: 290470213131016
83 Block: 290470213131017
84 Block: 290470213131018
85 Block: 290470213131019
86 Block: 290470213131020
87 Block: 290470213131021
88 Block: 290470213131022
89 Block: 290470213131023
90 Block: 290470213131024
91 Block: 290470213131030
92 Block: 290470213131031
93 Block: 290470213134000
94 Block: 290470213134001
95 Block: 290470213134002
96 Block: 290470213134003
97 Block: 290470213134004
98 Block: 290470213134005
99 Block: 290470213134006
100 Block: 290470213134007
101 Block: 290470213134008
102 Block: 290470213134009
103 Block: 290470213134010
104 Block: 290470213134013
105 Block: 290470213134020
106 Block: 290470213141010
107 Block: 290470213141011

HB 2 132
108 Block: 290470213141012
109 Block: 290470213141013
110 Block: 290470213141019
111 Block: 290470213141022
112 Block: 290470213141023
113 Block: 290470213141024
114 Block: 290470213141025
115 Block: 290470213141026
116 Block: 290470213141027
117 Block: 290470213141028
118 Block: 290470213141030
119 Block: 290470213141031
120 Block: 290470213142014
121 Block: 290470213142015
122 Block: 290470213142016
123 Block: 290470213142020
124 Block: 290470213142021
125 Block: 290470213142022
126 Block: 290470213142023
127 Block: 290470213142024
128 Block: 290470213142025
129 Block: 290470213142026
130 Block: 290470213142027
131 Block: 290470213142028
132 Block: 290470213142029
133 Block: 290470213142030
134 Block: 290470213142031
135 Block: 290470213142032
136 Block: 290470213142033
137 Block: 290470213142034
138 Block: 290470213142035
139 Block: 290470213142036
140 Block: 290470213142037
141 Block: 290470213142038
142 Block: 290470213144002
143 Block: 290470213144003
144 Block: 290470213144004

HB 2 133
145 Block: 290470213144005
146 Block: 290470213144006
147 Block: 290470213144007
148 Block: 290470213144008
149 Block: 290470213144009
150 Block: 290470213144010
151 Block: 290470213144011
152 Block: 290470213144012
153 Block: 290470213144013
154 Block: 290470213144014
155 Block: 290470213144015
156 Block: 290470213144016
157 Block: 290470213144017
158 Block: 290470213144018
159 Block: 290470213144019
160 Block: 290470213144020
161 Block: 290470213144021
162 Block: 290470213144022
163 Block: 290470213144023
164 Block: 290470213144024
165 VTD: KC 21-26
166 VTD: KC 21-27
167 VTD: Kry 1
168 VTD: Kry 2
169 VTD: Kry 3
170 VTD: Kry 4
171 VTD: Lib 1
172 VTD: Lib 10
173 VTD: Lib 11
174 VTD: Lib 12
175 VTD: Lib 13
176 Block: 290470208021051
177 Block: 290470222003068
178 Block: 290470223013013
179 Block: 290470223013014
180 Block: 290470223013015
181 Block: 290470223013016

HB 2 134
182 Block: 290470223013017
183 Block: 290470223013018
184 Block: 290470223021000
185 Block: 290470223021001
186 Block: 290470223021002
187 Block: 290470223021003
188 Block: 290470223021004
189 Block: 290470223021005
190 Block: 290470223021012
191 Block: 290470223021013
192 Block: 290470223021014
193 Block: 290470223021018
194 Block: 290470223021019
195 Block: 290470223021020
196 Block: 290470223021023
197 Block: 290470223021024
198 Block: 290470223021025
199 Block: 290470223021026
200 Block: 290470223021027
201 Block: 290470223021028
202 Block: 290470223021029
203 Block: 290470223021030
204 Block: 290470223021031
205 Block: 290470223021032
206 Block: 290470223022013
207 Block: 290470223022014
208 Block: 290470223022015
209 Block: 290470223023000
210 Block: 290470223023001
211 Block: 290470223023002
212 Block: 290470223023003
213 Block: 290470223023004
214 Block: 290470223023005
215 Block: 290470223023006
216 Block: 290470223023007
217 Block: 290470223023008
218 Block: 290470223023009

HB 2 135
219 Block: 290470223023013
220 Block: 290470223023020
221 Block: 290470223023021
222 Block: 290470223024000
223 Block: 290470223024001
224 Block: 290470223024002
225 Block: 290470223024003
226 Block: 290470223024012
227 Block: 290470223024013
228 Block: 290470223024014
229 Block: 290470223024017
230 Block: 290470223024018
231 Block: 290470223024019
232 Block: 290470223024020
233 Block: 290470223024021
234 Block: 290470223024022
235 Block: 290470223024023
236 Block: 290470223024024
237 Block: 290470223024025
238 Block: 290470223024026
239 Block: 290470223024027
240 Block: 290470223024028
241 Block: 290470223024029
242 Block: 290470223024030
243 Block: 290470223024031
244 VTD: Lib 14
245 VTD: Lib 2
246 VTD: Lib 3
247 VTD: Lib 4
248 VTD: Lib 5
249 Block: 290470208021013
250 Block: 290470208021031
251 Block: 290470208021032
252 Block: 290470208021033
253 Block: 290470208021035
254 Block: 290470208021036
255 Block: 290470208021037

HB 2 136
256 Block: 290470208021041
257 Block: 290470208021047
258 Block: 290470208021048
259 Block: 290470208021049
260 Block: 290470208021050
261 Block: 290470208021052
262 Block: 290470208021053
263 Block: 290470208021054
264 VTD: Lib 6
265 Block: 290470208021000
266 Block: 290470208021001
267 Block: 290470208021002
268 Block: 290470208021003
269 Block: 290470208021004
270 Block: 290470208021005
271 Block: 290470208021006
272 Block: 290470208021007
273 Block: 290470208021008
274 Block: 290470208021014
275 Block: 290470208021015
276 Block: 290470208021016
277 Block: 290470208021017
278 Block: 290470208021018
279 Block: 290470208021019
280 Block: 290470208021020
281 Block: 290470208021021
282 Block: 290470208021022
283 Block: 290470208021023
284 Block: 290470208021024
285 Block: 290470208021025
286 Block: 290470208021026
287 Block: 290470208021027
288 Block: 290470208021028
289 Block: 290470208021029
290 Block: 290470208021030
291 Block: 290470208021034
292 Block: 290470208021038

HB 2 137
293 Block: 290470208021039
294 Block: 290470208021040
295 Block: 290470208021042
296 Block: 290470208021055
297 Block: 290470208021056
298 Block: 290470208022001
299 Block: 290470208022002
300 Block: 290470208022003
301 Block: 290470208022004
302 Block: 290470208022005
303 Block: 290470208022006
304 Block: 290470208022007
305 Block: 290470208022008
306 Block: 290470208022009
307 Block: 290470208022010
308 Block: 290470208022011
309 Block: 290470208022012
310 Block: 290470208022013
311 Block: 290470208022014
312 Block: 290470208022015
313 Block: 290470208022016
314 Block: 290470208022017
315 Block: 290470208022018
316 Block: 290470208022019
317 Block: 290470208022020
318 Block: 290470208022023
319 Block: 290470213092024
320 Block: 290470223021006
321 Block: 290470223021007
322 Block: 290470223021008
323 Block: 290470223021009
324 Block: 290470223021010
325 Block: 290470223021011
326 Block: 290470223021015
327 Block: 290470223021016
328 Block: 290470223021017
329 Block: 290470223021021

HB 2 138
330 Block: 290470223021022
331 Block: 290470223024004
332 VTD: Lib 7
333 VTD: Lib 8
334 Block: 290470216021073
335 Block: 290470216021074
336 Block: 290470216021076
337 Block: 290470216021089
338 Block: 290470216021093
339 Block: 290470216021110
340 Block: 290470216021111
341 Block: 290470216021112
342 Block: 290470216021120
343 Block: 290470216022011
344 Block: 290470216022012
345 Block: 290470216022025
346 Block: 290470216022026
347 Block: 290470216022027
348 Block: 290470216022121
349 Block: 290470216022122
350 Block: 290470216022123
351 Block: 290470216022125
352 Block: 290470216022126
353 Block: 290470216022127
354 Block: 290470216022144
355 Block: 290470216022145
356 Block: 290470216022146
357 Block: 290470216022147
358 Block: 290470216022148
359 Block: 290470216022153
360 Block: 290470216022154
361 Block: 290470216022156
362 Block: 290470216022157
363 Block: 290470216022158
364 Block: 290470216022159
365 Block: 290470216022160
366 Block: 290470216022162

HB 2 139
367 Block: 290470216022165
368 Block: 290470216022166
369 Block: 290470216022168
370 Block: 290470216022171
371 Block: 290470216022172
372 VTD: Lib 9
373 VTD: Pl 1
374 VTD: Pl 2
375 VTD: Pl 3
376 VTD: Wash 1
377 VTD: Wash 2
378 VTD: Wash 3
379 County: Clinton MO
380 County: Daviess MO
381 County: DeKalb MO
382 County: Gentry MO
383 County: Grundy MO
384 County: Harrison MO
385 County: Holt MO
386 County: Howard MO
387 VTD: Bonne Femme
388 VTD: Burton
389 VTD: Chariton
390 Block: 290899601002001
391 Block: 290899601002002
392 Block: 290899601002003
393 Block: 290899601002004
394 Block: 290899601002005
395 Block: 290899601002006
396 Block: 290899601002013
397 Block: 290899601002014
398 Block: 290899601002015
399 Block: 290899601002016
400 Block: 290899601002017
401 Block: 290899601002018
402 Block: 290899601002019
403 Block: 290899601002020

HB 2 140
404 Block: 290899601002021
405 Block: 290899601002055
406 Block: 290899601002056
407 Block: 290899601002057
408 Block: 290899601002058
409 Block: 290899601002059
410 Block: 290899601002060
411 Block: 290899601002061
412 Block: 290899601002062
413 Block: 290899601002063
414 Block: 290899601002064
415 Block: 290899601002065
416 Block: 290899601002066
417 Block: 290899601002067
418 Block: 290899601002068
419 Block: 290899601002069
420 Block: 290899601002070
421 Block: 290899601002071
422 Block: 290899601002072
423 Block: 290899601002073
424 Block: 290899601002074
425 Block: 290899601002075
426 Block: 290899601002076
427 Block: 290899601002077
428 Block: 290899601002078
429 Block: 290899601002079
430 Block: 290899601002080
431 Block: 290899601002081
432 Block: 290899601002082
433 Block: 290899601002083
434 Block: 290899601002084
435 Block: 290899601002085
436 Block: 290899601002086
437 Block: 290899601002087
438 Block: 290899601002088
439 Block: 290899601002089
440 Block: 290899601002090

HB 2 141
441 Block: 290899601002091
442 Block: 290899601002092
443 Block: 290899601002093
444 Block: 290899601002094
445 Block: 290899601002095
446 Block: 290899601002096
447 Block: 290899601002097
448 Block: 290899601002098
449 Block: 290899601002099
450 Block: 290899601002102
451 Block: 290899601002103
452 Block: 290899601002104
453 Block: 290899601002105
454 Block: 290899601002106
455 Block: 290899601002107
456 Block: 290899601002108
457 Block: 290899601002109
458 Block: 290899601002110
459 Block: 290899601002111
460 Block: 290899601002113
461 Block: 290899601002114
462 Block: 290899601002115
463 Block: 290899601002116
464 Block: 290899601002117
465 Block: 290899601002118
466 Block: 290899601002119
467 Block: 290899601002120
468 Block: 290899601002121
469 Block: 290899601002122
470 Block: 290899601002123
471 Block: 290899601002124
472 Block: 290899601002125
473 Block: 290899601002126
474 Block: 290899601002127
475 Block: 290899601002128
476 Block: 290899601002129
477 Block: 290899601002130

HB 2 142
478 Block: 290899601002131
479 Block: 290899601002132
480 Block: 290899601002133
481 Block: 290899601002134
482 Block: 290899601002135
483 Block: 290899601002136
484 Block: 290899601002137
485 Block: 290899601002138
486 Block: 290899601002139
487 Block: 290899601002140
488 Block: 290899601002141
489 Block: 290899601002145
490 Block: 290899601002146
491 Block: 290899601002149
492 Block: 290899601002150
493 Block: 290899601002151
494 Block: 290899601002152
495 Block: 290899601002153
496 Block: 290899601002154
497 Block: 290899601002155
498 Block: 290899601002156
499 Block: 290899601002157
500 Block: 290899601002158
501 Block: 290899601002161
502 Block: 290899601002162
503 Block: 290899601002163
504 Block: 290899601002164
505 Block: 290899601002165
506 Block: 290899601002166
507 Block: 290899601002167
508 Block: 290899601002169
509 Block: 290899601002170
510 Block: 290899601002171
511 Block: 290899601002172
512 Block: 290899601002173
513 Block: 290899601002174
514 Block: 290899601002175

HB 2 143
515 Block: 290899601002176
516 Block: 290899601002184
517 Block: 290899601003000
518 Block: 290899601003001
519 Block: 290899601003002
520 Block: 290899601003003
521 Block: 290899601003004
522 Block: 290899601003005
523 Block: 290899601003006
524 Block: 290899601003007
525 Block: 290899601003008
526 Block: 290899601003009
527 Block: 290899601003010
528 Block: 290899601003011
529 Block: 290899601003012
530 Block: 290899601003013
531 Block: 290899601003014
532 Block: 290899601003015
533 Block: 290899601003016
534 Block: 290899601003017
535 Block: 290899601003018
536 Block: 290899601003019
537 Block: 290899601003020
538 Block: 290899601003021
539 Block: 290899601003022
540 Block: 290899601003023
541 Block: 290899601003024
542 Block: 290899601003025
543 Block: 290899601003026
544 Block: 290899601003027
545 Block: 290899601003028
546 Block: 290899601003029
547 Block: 290899601003030
548 Block: 290899601003031
549 Block: 290899601003032
550 Block: 290899601003033
551 Block: 290899601003034

HB 2 144
552 Block: 290899601003035
553 Block: 290899601003036
554 Block: 290899601003037
555 Block: 290899601003038
556 Block: 290899601003039
557 Block: 290899601003040
558 Block: 290899601003041
559 Block: 290899601003042
560 Block: 290899601003043
561 Block: 290899601003044
562 Block: 290899601003045
563 Block: 290899601003046
564 Block: 290899601003047
565 Block: 290899601003048
566 Block: 290899601003049
567 Block: 290899601003050
568 Block: 290899601003051
569 Block: 290899601003052
570 Block: 290899601003053
571 Block: 290899601003054
572 Block: 290899601003055
573 Block: 290899601003056
574 Block: 290899601003057
575 Block: 290899601003058
576 Block: 290899601003059
577 Block: 290899601003060
578 Block: 290899601003061
579 Block: 290899601003062
580 Block: 290899601003063
581 Block: 290899602001002
582 Block: 290899602001003
583 Block: 290899602001004
584 Block: 290899602001005
585 Block: 290899602001008
586 Block: 290899602001011
587 Block: 290899602001012
588 Block: 290899602001013

HB 2 145
589 Block: 290899602001014
590 Block: 290899602001015
591 Block: 290899602001055
592 Block: 290899603001030
593 Block: 290899603001031
594 Block: 290899603001032
595 Block: 290899603001033
596 Block: 290899603001042
597 Block: 290899603001048
598 VTD: Prairie
599 VTD: Richmond
600 Block: 290899601001184
601 Block: 290899601001192
602 Block: 290899601001193
603 Block: 290899601001194
604 Block: 290899601001289
605 Block: 290899601001290
606 Block: 290899601001298
607 Block: 290899601001299
608 Block: 290899601002148
609 Block: 290899601002159
610 Block: 290899601002160
611 Block: 290899601002168
612 Block: 290899602001000
613 Block: 290899602001001
614 Block: 290899602002048
615 Block: 290899602002063
616 Block: 290899602002064
617 Block: 290899602002065
618 Block: 290899602002066
619 Block: 290899602002073
620 Block: 290899602002082
621 Block: 290899602002083
622 Block: 290899602002084
623 Block: 290899602002085
624 Block: 290899602002086
625 Block: 290899602002087

HB 2 146
626 Block: 290899602002242
627 Block: 290899603001003
628 Block: 290899603001004
629 Block: 290899603001005
630 Block: 290899603001006
631 Block: 290899603001007
632 Block: 290899603001008
633 Block: 290899603001009
634 Block: 290899603001010
635 Block: 290899603001011
636 Block: 290899603001018
637 Block: 290899603001019
638 Block: 290899603001020
639 Block: 290899603001022
640 Block: 290899603001023
641 Block: 290899603001024
642 Block: 290899603001025
643 Block: 290899603001026
644 Block: 290899603001027
645 Block: 290899603001028
646 Block: 290899603001029
647 Block: 290899603001034
648 Block: 290899603001035
649 Block: 290899603001036
650 Block: 290899603001037
651 Block: 290899603001038
652 Block: 290899603001039
653 Block: 290899603001040
654 Block: 290899603001041
655 Block: 290899603001043
656 Block: 290899603001044
657 Block: 290899603001045
658 Block: 290899603001046
659 Block: 290899603001047
660 Block: 290899603001049
661 Block: 290899603001050
662 Block: 290899603001051

HB 2 147
663 Block: 290899603001052
664 Block: 290899603001053
665 Block: 290899603001054
666 Block: 290899603001055
667 Block: 290899603001056
668 Block: 290899603001057
669 Block: 290899603001058
670 Block: 290899603001059
671 Block: 290899603001060
672 Block: 290899603001061
673 Block: 290899603001062
674 Block: 290899603001063
675 Block: 290899603001064
676 Block: 290899603001065
677 Block: 290899603001066
678 Block: 290899603001067
679 Block: 290899603001068
680 Block: 290899603001069
681 Block: 290899603001070
682 Block: 290899603001071
683 Block: 290899603001072
684 Block: 290899603001073
685 Block: 290899603001074
686 Block: 290899603001075
687 Block: 290899603001076
688 Block: 290899603001077
689 Block: 290899603001078
690 Block: 290899603001079
691 Block: 290899603001080
692 Block: 290899603001081
693 Block: 290899603001082
694 Block: 290899603001083
695 Block: 290899603001084
696 Block: 290899603001085
697 Block: 290899603001086
698 Block: 290899603001087
699 Block: 290899603001088

HB 2 148
700 Block: 290899603001089
701 Block: 290899603001090
702 Block: 290899603001104
703 Block: 290899603001105
704 Block: 290899603001106
705 Block: 290899603001107
706 Block: 290899603001108
707 Block: 290899603001109
708 Block: 290899603001110
709 Block: 290899603001111
710 Block: 290899603001112
711 Block: 290899603001113
712 Block: 290899603001114
713 Block: 290899603001115
714 Block: 290899603001116
715 Block: 290899603001117
716 Block: 290899603001118
717 Block: 290899603001119
718 Block: 290899603001120
719 Block: 290899603001121
720 Block: 290899603001122
721 Block: 290899603001123
722 Block: 290899603001124
723 Block: 290899603001125
724 Block: 290899603001126
725 Block: 290899603001127
726 Block: 290899603001128
727 Block: 290899603001130
728 Block: 290899603001131
729 Block: 290899603001132
730 Block: 290899603001133
731 Block: 290899603001144
732 Block: 290899603001145
733 Block: 290899603001146
734 Block: 290899603001147
735 Block: 290899603001148
736 Block: 290899603001149

HB 2 149
737 Block: 290899603001150
738 Block: 290899603001151
739 Block: 290899603001152
740 Block: 290899603001153
741 Block: 290899603001158
742 Block: 290899603001159
743 Block: 290899603001160
744 Block: 290899603001161
745 Block: 290899603001166
746 Block: 290899603001168
747 Block: 290899603002000
748 Block: 290899603002001
749 Block: 290899603002002
750 Block: 290899603002003
751 Block: 290899603002004
752 Block: 290899603002005
753 Block: 290899603002006
754 Block: 290899603002007
755 Block: 290899603002008
756 Block: 290899603002009
757 Block: 290899603002010
758 Block: 290899603002011
759 Block: 290899603002012
760 Block: 290899603002013
761 Block: 290899603002014
762 Block: 290899603002015
763 Block: 290899603002016
764 Block: 290899603002017
765 Block: 290899603002018
766 Block: 290899603002019
767 Block: 290899603002020
768 Block: 290899603002021
769 Block: 290899603002022
770 Block: 290899603002023
771 Block: 290899603002024
772 Block: 290899603002025
773 Block: 290899603002026

HB 2 150
774 Block: 290899603002027
775 Block: 290899603002028
776 Block: 290899603002029
777 Block: 290899603002030
778 Block: 290899603002031
779 Block: 290899603002032
780 Block: 290899603002033
781 Block: 290899603002034
782 Block: 290899603002035
783 Block: 290899603002036
784 Block: 290899603002037
785 Block: 290899603002038
786 Block: 290899603002039
787 Block: 290899603002040
788 Block: 290899603002041
789 Block: 290899603002042
790 Block: 290899603002043
791 Block: 290899603002044
792 Block: 290899603002045
793 Block: 290899603002046
794 Block: 290899603002047
795 Block: 290899603002048
796 Block: 290899603002049
797 Block: 290899603002050
798 Block: 290899603003000
799 Block: 290899603003001
800 Block: 290899603003002
801 Block: 290899603003003
802 Block: 290899603003004
803 Block: 290899603003005
804 Block: 290899603003006
805 Block: 290899603003007
806 Block: 290899603003008
807 Block: 290899603003009
808 Block: 290899603003010
809 Block: 290899603003011
810 Block: 290899603003012

HB 2 151
811 Block: 290899603003013
812 Block: 290899603003014
813 Block: 290899603003015
814 Block: 290899603003016
815 Block: 290899603003017
816 Block: 290899603003018
817 Block: 290899603003019
818 Block: 290899603003020
819 Block: 290899603003021
820 Block: 290899603003022
821 Block: 290899603003023
822 Block: 290899603003024
823 Block: 290899603003025
824 Block: 290899603003026
825 Block: 290899603003027
826 Block: 290899603003028
827 Block: 290899603003029
828 Block: 290899603003030
829 Block: 290899603003031
830 Block: 290899603003032
831 Block: 290899603003033
832 Block: 290899603003034
833 Block: 290899603003035
834 Block: 290899603003036
835 Block: 290899603003037
836 Block: 290899603003038
837 Block: 290899603003039
838 Block: 290899603003040
839 Block: 290899603003041
840 Block: 290899603003042
841 Block: 290899603003043
842 Block: 290899603003044
843 Block: 290899603003045
844 Block: 290899603003046
845 Block: 290899603003047
846 Block: 290899603003048
847 Block: 290899603003049

HB 2 152
848 Block: 290899603003050
849 Block: 290899603003051
850 Block: 290899603003052
851 Block: 290899603003053
852 Block: 290899603003054
853 Block: 290899603003055
854 Block: 290899603003056
855 Block: 290899603003057
856 Block: 290899603003058
857 Block: 290899603003059
858 Block: 290899603003060
859 Block: 290899603003061
860 Block: 290899603003062
861 Block: 290899603004000
862 Block: 290899603004001
863 Block: 290899603004002
864 Block: 290899603004003
865 Block: 290899603004004
866 Block: 290899603004005
867 Block: 290899603004006
868 Block: 290899603004007
869 Block: 290899603004008
870 Block: 290899603004009
871 Block: 290899603004010
872 Block: 290899603004011
873 Block: 290899603004012
874 Block: 290899603004013
875 Block: 290899603004014
876 Block: 290899603004015
877 Block: 290899603004016
878 Block: 290899603004017
879 Block: 290899603004018
880 Block: 290899603004019
881 Block: 290899603004020
882 Block: 290899603004021
883 Block: 290899603004022
884 Block: 290899603004023

HB 2 153
885 Block: 290899603004024
886 Block: 290899603004025
887 Block: 290899603004026
888 Block: 290899603004027
889 Block: 290899603004028
890 Block: 290899603004029
891 Block: 290899603004030
892 Block: 290899603004031
893 Block: 290899603004032
894 Block: 290899603004033
895 Block: 290899603004034
896 Block: 290899603004035
897 Block: 290899603004036
898 Block: 290899603004037
899 Block: 290899603004038
900 Block: 290899603004039
901 Block: 290899603004040
902 Block: 290899603004041
903 County: Jackson MO
904 VTD: Blue 03-01
905 Block: 290950147021004
906 Block: 290950147021005
907 Block: 290950147021006
908 Block: 290950147021007
909 VTD: Blue 03-07
910 Block: 290950151001002
911 Block: 290950151001003
912 VTD: Blue 03-08
913 Block: 290950150001057
914 Block: 290950150001061
915 Block: 290950150001062
916 Block: 290950151001004
917 Block: 290950151001057
918 VTD: Blue 03-09
919 Block: 290950150001003
920 Block: 290950150001004
921 Block: 290950150001005

HB 2 154
922 Block: 290950150001006
923 Block: 290950150001007
924 Block: 290950150001008
925 Block: 290950150001009
926 Block: 290950150001010
927 Block: 290950150001011
928 Block: 290950150001012
929 Block: 290950150001013
930 Block: 290950150001015
931 Block: 290950150001017
932 Block: 290950150001050
933 Block: 290950150001051
934 Block: 290950150001058
935 Block: 290950150001059
936 Block: 290950150001063
937 Block: 290950150001064
938 Block: 290950150001065
939 Block: 290950150001066
940 Block: 290950150001067
941 Block: 290950150001068
942 VTD: Blue 06-06
943 Block: 290950147021027
944 Block: 290950147021028
945 VTD: Blue 06-07
946 Block: 290950147021023
947 Block: 290950147021024
948 Block: 290950147021025
949 Block: 290950147021026
950 Block: 290950147021036
951 VTD: Blue 08-02
952 Block: 290950147013000
953 Block: 290950147013003
954 Block: 290950147013004
955 VTD: Blue 08-05
956 Block: 290950147012000
957 Block: 290950147012001
958 Block: 290950147013002

HB 2 155
959 Block: 290950147013005
960 Block: 290950147013006
961 Block: 290950147013007
962 Block: 290950147013008
963 Block: 290950147013009
964 VTD: Fort Osage 01
965 Block: 290950177001046
966 Block: 290950177001049
967 VTD: Fort Osage 02
968 Block: 290950148041000
969 Block: 290950148041001
970 Block: 290950148041002
971 Block: 290950148041003
972 Block: 290950148041004
973 Block: 290950148041005
974 Block: 290950148041006
975 Block: 290950148041007
976 Block: 290950148041008
977 Block: 290950148041009
978 Block: 290950148041010
979 Block: 290950148041011
980 Block: 290950148041012
981 Block: 290950177001000
982 Block: 290950177001001
983 Block: 290950177001002
984 Block: 290950177001003
985 Block: 290950177001004
986 Block: 290950177001005
987 Block: 290950177001006
988 Block: 290950177001007
989 Block: 290950177001008
990 Block: 290950177001009
991 Block: 290950177001010
992 Block: 290950177001011
993 Block: 290950177001012
994 Block: 290950177001013
995 Block: 290950177001014

HB 2 156
996 Block: 290950177001017
997 Block: 290950177001018
998 Block: 290950177001019
999 Block: 290950177001020
1000 Block: 290950177001021
1001 Block: 290950177001024
1002 Block: 290950177001025
1003 Block: 290950177001035
1004 Block: 290950177001036
1005 Block: 290950177001037
1006 Block: 290950177001038
1007 Block: 290950177001039
1008 Block: 290950177001040
1009 Block: 290950177001041
1010 Block: 290950177001042
1011 Block: 290950177001043
1012 Block: 290950177001044
1013 Block: 290950177001045
1014 Block: 290950177001047
1015 Block: 290950177001048
1016 Block: 290950177001056
1017 Block: 290950177001057
1018 Block: 290950177001058
1019 Block: 290950177001059
1020 Block: 290950177001060
1021 Block: 290950177001061
1022 Block: 290950177001062
1023 Block: 290950177001063
1024 Block: 290950177001064
1025 Block: 290950177001065
1026 Block: 290950177001067
1027 Block: 290950177001068
1028 Block: 290950177001074
1029 VTD: Fort Osage 03
1030 VTD: Fort Osage 04
1031 VTD: Fort Osage 05
1032 VTD: Fort Osage 06

HB 2 157
1033 VTD: Fort Osage 07
1034 VTD: Fort Osage 08
1035 VTD: Fort Osage 09
1036 VTD: Fort Osage 10
1037 VTD: Prairie 03
1038 Block: 290950137063006
1039 Block: 290950137063007
1040 VTD: Prairie 04
1041 Block: 290950137051000
1042 VTD: Prairie 05
1043 VTD: Prairie 06
1044 VTD: Prairie 27
1045 Block: 290950142031000
1046 Block: 290950142033000
1047 Block: 290950185003005
1048 Block: 290950185003007
1049 VTD: Prairie 29
1050 Block: 290950142061000
1051 Block: 290950185002000
1052 Block: 290950185002001
1053 Block: 290950185002002
1054 Block: 290950185002006
1055 Block: 290950185003006
1056 Block: 290950185003008
1057 Block: 290950185003009
1058 Block: 290950185003010
1059 Block: 290950185003011
1060 Block: 290950185003012
1061 Block: 290950185003013
1062 Block: 290950185003014
1063 Block: 290950185003015
1064 Block: 290950185003016
1065 Block: 290950185003017
1066 Block: 290950185003018
1067 Block: 290950193022014
1068 Block: 290950193022015
1069 Block: 290950193022016

HB 2 158
1070 Block: 290959891001001
1071 Block: 290959891001002
1072 Block: 290959891001003
1073 Block: 290959891001011
1074 VTD: Prairie 32
1075 VTD: Prairie 37
1076 VTD: Prairie 38
1077 VTD: Prairie 39
1078 VTD: Prairie 40
1079 Block: 290950137051018
1080 Block: 290950137063000
1081 Block: 290950138012010
1082 Block: 290950138012011
1083 Block: 290950138012012
1084 Block: 290950138012013
1085 Block: 290950138012014
1086 Block: 290950138012015
1087 Block: 290950138012016
1088 Block: 290950138012017
1089 Block: 290950138012018
1090 Block: 290950138012019
1091 Block: 290950138012020
1092 Block: 290950138012021
1093 Block: 290950138031000
1094 Block: 290950138031001
1095 Block: 290950138031002
1096 Block: 290950138031003
1097 Block: 290950138031004
1098 Block: 290950138031005
1099 Block: 290950138031006
1100 Block: 290950138031007
1101 Block: 290950138031008
1102 Block: 290950138031009
1103 Block: 290950138031010
1104 Block: 290950138031011
1105 Block: 290950138031012
1106 Block: 290950138031013

HB 2 159
1107 Block: 290950138031014
1108 Block: 290950138031015
1109 Block: 290950138031016
1110 Block: 290950138031017
1111 Block: 290950179003000
1112 Block: 290950179003009
1113 VTD: Prairie 41
1114 VTD: Prairie 42
1115 VTD: Prairie 43
1116 VTD: Prairie 44
1117 VTD: Prairie 45
1118 VTD: Prairie 46
1119 VTD: Prairie 47
1120 VTD: Prairie 51
1121 VTD: Prairie 52
1122 Block: 290950141111018
1123 VTD: Prairie 59
1124 Block: 290950139044000
1125 Block: 290950139044001
1126 Block: 290950139044002
1127 Block: 290950139161004
1128 Block: 290950139161005
1129 Block: 290950139161006
1130 Block: 290950139161027
1131 Block: 290950139161028
1132 Block: 290950139182020
1133 Block: 290950139182021
1134 Block: 290950139182022
1135 Block: 290950139182023
1136 Block: 290950139182024
1137 Block: 290950139182025
1138 Block: 290950139182026
1139 Block: 290950139182027
1140 Block: 290950139182029
1141 VTD: Prarie 01
1142 VTD: Prarie 53
1143 VTD: Prarie 54

HB 2 160
1144 Block: 290950139161000
1145 Block: 290950139161001
1146 Block: 290950139161002
1147 Block: 290950139161003
1148 Block: 290950139182000
1149 Block: 290950139182001
1150 Block: 290950139182002
1151 Block: 290950139182003
1152 Block: 290950139182004
1153 Block: 290950139182005
1154 Block: 290950139182006
1155 Block: 290950139182007
1156 Block: 290950139182010
1157 Block: 290950139182012
1158 Block: 290950139182013
1159 Block: 290950139182014
1160 Block: 290950139182017
1161 Block: 290950139182019
1162 VTD: Prarie 55
1163 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 02
1164 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 03
1165 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 04
1166 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 05
1167 Block: 290950148041021
1168 Block: 290950148041022
1169 Block: 290950148041023
1170 Block: 290950148041024
1171 Block: 290950148041025
1172 Block: 290950148041026
1173 Block: 290950148041027
1174 Block: 290950148041028
1175 Block: 290950148041030
1176 Block: 290950148041031
1177 Block: 290950148041032
1178 Block: 290950148041035
1179 Block: 290950148041037
1180 Block: 290950148041038

HB 2 161
1181 Block: 290950148042000
1182 Block: 290950148042001
1183 Block: 290950148042002
1184 Block: 290950148042003
1185 Block: 290950148042004
1186 Block: 290950148042005
1187 Block: 290950148042006
1188 Block: 290950148042029
1189 Block: 290950148042030
1190 Block: 290959892001000
1191 Block: 290959892001001
1192 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 06
1193 Block: 290950148041013
1194 Block: 290950148041014
1195 Block: 290950148041015
1196 Block: 290950148041016
1197 Block: 290950148041017
1198 Block: 290950148041018
1199 Block: 290950148041019
1200 Block: 290950148041020
1201 Block: 290950148041029
1202 Block: 290950149033001
1203 Block: 290950177001050
1204 Block: 290950177001051
1205 Block: 290950177001052
1206 Block: 290950177001053
1207 Block: 290950177001054
1208 Block: 290950177001055
1209 Block: 290950177001066
1210 Block: 290950177001069
1211 Block: 290950177001070
1212 Block: 290950177001071
1213 Block: 290950177001072
1214 Block: 290950177001073
1215 Block: 290950177001075
1216 Block: 290950177001076
1217 Block: 290950177001077

HB 2 162
1218 Block: 290950177001078
1219 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 08
1220 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 09
1221 Block: 290950148061010
1222 Block: 290950148061011
1223 Block: 290950148061012
1224 Block: 290950148061013
1225 Block: 290950148061014
1226 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 17
1227 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 18
1228 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 19
1229 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 21
1230 Block: 290950193022052
1231 Block: 290950193022053
1232 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 22
1233 Block: 290950141242006
1234 Block: 290950141243025
1235 Block: 290950141243026
1236 Block: 290950141262001
1237 Block: 290950141262010
1238 Block: 290950141262011
1239 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 24
1240 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 25
1241 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 26
1242 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 27
1243 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 28
1244 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 34
1245 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 35
1246 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 36
1247 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 40
1248 Block: 290950149032005
1249 Block: 290950149032006
1250 Block: 290950149032007
1251 Block: 290950149032008
1252 Block: 290950149032009
1253 Block: 290950149032010
1254 Block: 290950149032011

HB 2 163
1255 Block: 290950149032012
1256 Block: 290950149032013
1257 Block: 290950149032015
1258 Block: 290950149032016
1259 Block: 290950149032017
1260 Block: 290950149032018
1261 Block: 290950149032022
1262 Block: 290950149032023
1263 Block: 290950149032024
1264 Block: 290950149032036
1265 Block: 290950149032037
1266 Block: 290950149032041
1267 Block: 290950149032042
1268 Block: 290950149032057
1269 Block: 290950149033020
1270 Block: 290950149033023
1271 Block: 290950149033029
1272 Block: 290950149033030
1273 Block: 290950149033031
1274 Block: 290950149033033
1275 Block: 290950149052000
1276 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 42
1277 Block: 290950149032058
1278 Block: 290950149033032
1279 Block: 290950149033034
1280 Block: 290950149033035
1281 Block: 290950149033036
1282 Block: 290950149033037
1283 Block: 290950149033038
1284 Block: 290950149033039
1285 Block: 290950149033040
1286 Block: 290950149033042
1287 Block: 290950149033043
1288 Block: 290950149033044
1289 Block: 290950149033045
1290 Block: 290950149033046
1291 Block: 290950149033047

HB 2 164
1292 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 43
1293 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 46
1294 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 47
1295 Block: 290950140043018
1296 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 50
1297 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 51
1298 VTD: Van Buren 04
1299 VTD: Van Buren 06
1300 VTD: Van Buren 07
1301 Block: 290950139182028
1302 County: Knox MO
1303 County: Lewis MO
1304 County: Linn MO
1305 County: Livingston MO
1306 County: Macon MO
1307 County: Marion MO
1308 County: Mercer MO
1309 County: Monroe MO
1310 County: Nodaway MO
1311 County: Pike MO
1312 County: Platte MO
1313 County: Putnam MO
1314 County: Ralls MO
1315 County: Randolph MO
1316 County: Ray MO
1317 County: Schuyler MO
1318 County: Scotland MO
1319 County: Shelby MO
1320 County: Sullivan MO
1321 County: Worth MO
128.477. The seventh congressional district shall be composed of the following:
2 County: Barry MO
3 County: Christian MO
4 County: Greene MO
5 County: Jasper MO
6 County: Lawrence MO
7 County: McDonald MO

HB 2 165
8 County: Newton MO
9 County: Polk MO
10 VTD: East Looney
11 VTD: Jackson
12 VTD: Northeast Marion
13 Block: 291679602022002
14 Block: 291679602022005
15 Block: 291679602022006
16 Block: 291679602022007
17 Block: 291679602022008
18 Block: 291679602022009
19 Block: 291679602022010
20 Block: 291679602022011
21 Block: 291679602022012
22 Block: 291679602022013
23 Block: 291679602022014
24 Block: 291679602022015
25 Block: 291679602022016
26 Block: 291679602022017
27 Block: 291679602022018
28 Block: 291679602022019
29 Block: 291679602022020
30 Block: 291679602022021
31 Block: 291679602022022
32 Block: 291679602022023
33 Block: 291679602022024
34 Block: 291679602022025
35 Block: 291679602022026
36 Block: 291679602022027
37 Block: 291679602022028
38 Block: 291679602022029
39 Block: 291679602022030
40 Block: 291679602022031
41 Block: 291679602022032
42 Block: 291679602022033
43 Block: 291679602022034
44 Block: 291679602022035

HB 2 166
45 Block: 291679602022036
46 Block: 291679602022037
47 Block: 291679602022038
48 Block: 291679602022039
49 Block: 291679602022040
50 Block: 291679602022041
51 Block: 291679602022042
52 Block: 291679602022043
53 Block: 291679602022044
54 Block: 291679602022045
55 Block: 291679602022046
56 Block: 291679602022047
57 Block: 291679602022048
58 Block: 291679602022049
59 Block: 291679602022050
60 Block: 291679602022051
61 Block: 291679602022052
62 Block: 291679602022053
63 Block: 291679602022054
64 Block: 291679602022055
65 Block: 291679602023004
66 Block: 291679602023007
67 Block: 291679602023008
68 Block: 291679602023009
69 Block: 291679602023010
70 Block: 291679602023011
71 Block: 291679602023012
72 Block: 291679602023013
73 Block: 291679602023014
74 Block: 291679602023015
75 Block: 291679602023016
76 Block: 291679602023017
77 Block: 291679602023018
78 Block: 291679602023019
79 Block: 291679602023020
80 Block: 291679602023021
81 Block: 291679602023022

HB 2 167
82 Block: 291679602023023
83 Block: 291679602023024
84 Block: 291679602023025
85 Block: 291679602023026
86 VTD: Northwest Marion
87 Block: 291679601023021
88 Block: 291679601023024
89 Block: 291679601023034
90 Block: 291679601023035
91 Block: 291679601023036
92 Block: 291679601023041
93 Block: 291679601023046
94 Block: 291679601023047
95 Block: 291679601023048
96 Block: 291679601023049
97 Block: 291679601023050
98 Block: 291679601023051
99 Block: 291679601023052
100 Block: 291679601023053
101 Block: 291679601023054
102 Block: 291679601023055
103 Block: 291679601023056
104 Block: 291679601023057
105 Block: 291679601023058
106 Block: 291679601023059
107 Block: 291679601023060
108 Block: 291679601023061
109 Block: 291679601023062
110 Block: 291679601023063
111 Block: 291679601023064
112 Block: 291679601023065
113 Block: 291679601023067
114 Block: 291679601023068
115 Block: 291679601023070
116 Block: 291679601023071
117 Block: 291679601024000
118 Block: 291679601024001

HB 2 168
119 Block: 291679601024002
120 Block: 291679601024003
121 Block: 291679601024004
122 Block: 291679601024005
123 Block: 291679601024006
124 Block: 291679601024007
125 Block: 291679601024008
126 Block: 291679601024009
127 Block: 291679601024010
128 Block: 291679601024011
129 Block: 291679601024012
130 Block: 291679601024013
131 Block: 291679601024014
132 Block: 291679601024015
133 Block: 291679601024016
134 Block: 291679601024017
135 Block: 291679601024018
136 Block: 291679601024019
137 Block: 291679601024020
138 Block: 291679601024021
139 Block: 291679601024022
140 Block: 291679601024023
141 Block: 291679601024024
142 Block: 291679601024025
143 Block: 291679601024026
144 Block: 291679601024027
145 Block: 291679601024028
146 Block: 291679601024029
147 Block: 291679601024030
148 Block: 291679601024031
149 Block: 291679601024032
150 Block: 291679601024033
151 Block: 291679601024034
152 Block: 291679601024035
153 Block: 291679601024036
154 Block: 291679601024037
155 Block: 291679601024038

HB 2 169
156 Block: 291679601024039
157 Block: 291679604022005
158 Block: 291679604022006
159 Block: 291679604022007
160 Block: 291679604022008
161 Block: 291679604022009
162 Block: 291679604022010
163 Block: 291679604022011
164 Block: 291679604022012
165 Block: 291679604022013
166 Block: 291679604022015
167 Block: 291679604022016
168 Block: 291679604022019
169 Block: 291679604022029
170 Block: 291679604022030
171 Block: 291679604022031
172 Block: 291679604022032
173 Block: 291679604022038
174 VTD: Southeast Marion
175 VTD: Southwest Marion
176 VTD: Union
177 Block: 291679604021099
178 Block: 291679604021110
179 Block: 291679604021112
180 Block: 291679604021113
181 Block: 291679604021118
182 Block: 291679604021119
183 Block: 291679604021120
184 Block: 291679604021121
185 Block: 291679604023011
186 Block: 291679604023020
187 Block: 291679604023021
188 Block: 291679604023022
189 Block: 291679604023023
190 Block: 291679604023024
191 Block: 291679604023025
192 Block: 291679604024001

HB 2 170
193 Block: 291679604024002
194 Block: 291679604024003
195 Block: 291679604024006
196 Block: 291679604024007
197 Block: 291679604024008
198 Block: 291679604024009
199 Block: 291679604024010
200 Block: 291679604024011
201 Block: 291679604024012
202 Block: 291679604024013
203 Block: 291679604024014
204 Block: 291679604024015
205 Block: 291679604024018
206 Block: 291679604024019
207 Block: 291679604024020
208 Block: 291679604024021
209 Block: 291679604024023
210 Block: 291679604024024
211 Block: 291679604024026
212 Block: 291679604024027
213 Block: 291679604024028
214 Block: 291679604024029
215 Block: 291679604024032
216 Block: 291679604024033
217 Block: 291679604024034
218 Block: 291679604024035
219 Block: 291679604024036
220 Block: 291679604024037
221 Block: 291679604024041
222 Block: 291679604024042
223 Block: 291679604024043
224 Block: 291679604024054
225 Block: 291679604024055
226 Block: 291679604024056
227 Block: 291679604024057
228 Block: 291679604024066
229 Block: 291679604024074

HB 2 171
230 Block: 291679604024145
231 VTD: West Looney
232 VTD: Wishart
233 County: Stone MO
234 County: Taney MO
128.478. The eighth congressional district shall be composed of the following:
2 County: Bollinger MO
3 County: Butler MO
4 County: Cape Girardeau MO
5 County: Carter MO
6 County: Crawford MO
7 VTD: Benton North
8 VTD: Benton South
9 VTD: Blue Springs
10 VTD: Bourbon
11 VTD: Cherryville
12 Block: 290554502001016
13 Block: 290554502001017
14 Block: 290554502001023
15 Block: 290554502001046
16 Block: 290554502003036
17 Block: 290554502003061
18 VTD: Davisville
19 Block: 290554502001000
20 Block: 290554502001001
21 Block: 290554502001002
22 Block: 290554502001003
23 Block: 290554502001004
24 Block: 290554502001005
25 Block: 290554502001006
26 Block: 290554502001007
27 Block: 290554502001008
28 Block: 290554502001009
29 Block: 290554502001010
30 Block: 290554502001011
31 Block: 290554502001012
32 Block: 290554502001013

HB 2 172
33 Block: 290554502001014
34 Block: 290554502001015
35 Block: 290554502001025
36 Block: 290554502001026
37 Block: 290554502001027
38 Block: 290554502001028
39 Block: 290554502001029
40 Block: 290554502001030
41 Block: 290554502001031
42 Block: 290554502001032
43 Block: 290554502001033
44 Block: 290554502001034
45 Block: 290554502001035
46 Block: 290554502001036
47 Block: 290554502001037
48 Block: 290554502001038
49 Block: 290554502001039
50 Block: 290554502001040
51 Block: 290554502001041
52 Block: 290554502001042
53 Block: 290554502001043
54 Block: 290554502001044
55 Block: 290554502001045
56 Block: 290554502001047
57 Block: 290554502001051
58 Block: 290554502001052
59 Block: 290554502001053
60 Block: 290554502001054
61 Block: 290554502001055
62 Block: 290554502001056
63 Block: 290554502001057
64 Block: 290554502001058
65 Block: 290554502001059
66 Block: 290554502001060
67 Block: 290554502001061
68 Block: 290554502001062
69 Block: 290554502001063

HB 2 173
70 Block: 290554502001064
71 Block: 290554502001068
72 Block: 290554502001070
73 Block: 290554502001071
74 Block: 290554502001072
75 Block: 290554502003040
76 Block: 290554502003041
77 Block: 290554502003047
78 Block: 290554502003048
79 Block: 290554502003049
80 Block: 290554502003050
81 Block: 290554502003051
82 Block: 290554502003052
83 Block: 290554502003053
84 Block: 290554502003054
85 Block: 290554502003055
86 Block: 290554502003056
87 Block: 290554502003062
88 Block: 290554502003063
89 Block: 290554502003064
90 Block: 290554502003065
91 Block: 290554502003066
92 Block: 290554502003067
93 Block: 290554502003068
94 VTD: Delhi
95 VTD: Fanning
96 VTD: Gibbs
97 VTD: Huzzah
98 VTD: Leasburg
99 VTD: Liberty
100 VTD: Meramec North
101 VTD: Meramec South
102 VTD: Sullivan
103 VTD: Taylor
104 County: Dunklin MO
105 County: Howell MO
106 County: Iron MO

HB 2 174
107 County: Jefferson MO
108 County: Madison MO
109 County: Mississippi MO
110 County: New Madrid MO
111 County: Oregon MO
112 County: Ozark MO
113 County: Pemiscot MO
114 County: Perry MO
115 County: Reynolds MO
116 County: Ripley MO
117 County: Scott MO
118 County: Shannon MO
119 County: St. Francois MO
120 County: Ste. Genevieve MO
121 County: Stoddard MO
122 County: Washington MO
123 County: Wayne MO
128.479. Upon the passage and enactment of sections 128.461 to 128.468, and as
2 providedtotherevisorofstatutes,therevisorofstatutesshallpublishthegraphicalmap
3 representation of the official congressional district boundaries as an appendix of the
4 Revised Statutes of Missouri.
✔